Nevada, session 83, SB495.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 439 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
“High-level provider of health care” means a physician or
physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of
NRS, dentist, advanced practice registered nurse, chiropractic
physician, podiatric physician or physical therapist.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 439.581 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.581 As used in NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 439.582 to 439.585, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2.5. NRS 439.588 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.588 1. A health information exchange shall not operate
in this State without first obtaining certification as provided in
subsection 2.
2. The Director shall by regulation establish the manner in
which a health information exchange may apply for certification and
the requirements for granting such certification, which must include,
without limitation, that the health information exchange demonstrate
its financial and operational sustainability, adherence to the privacy,
security and patient consent standards adopted pursuant to NRS
439.589 and capacity for interoperability with any other health
information exchange certified pursuant to this section.
3. The Director may deny an application for certification or
may suspend or revoke any certification issued pursuant to
subsection 2 for failure to comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 1 of this act or the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto or any applicable federal or
state law.
4. When the Director intends to deny, suspend or revoke a
certification, he or she shall give reasonable notice to all parties by
certified mail. The notice must contain the legal authority,
jurisdiction and reasons for the action to be taken. A health
information exchange that wishes to contest the action of the
Director must file an appeal with the Director.
5. The Director shall adopt regulations establishing the manner
in which a person may file a complaint with the Director regarding a
violation of the provisions of this section.
6. The Director may impose an administrative fine against a
health information exchange which operates in this State without
-
*SB495_R1*

– 9 –
holding a certification in an amount established by the Director by
regulation. The Director shall afford a health information exchange
so fined an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 233B.121.
7. The Director may adopt such regulations as he or she
determines are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3.3. NRS 439.589 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.589 1. The Director, in consultation with health care
providers, third parties and other interested persons and entities,
shall by regulation prescribe a framework for the electronic
maintenance, transmittal and exchange of electronic health records,
prescriptions, health-related information and electronic signatures
and requirements for electronic equivalents of written entries or
written approvals in accordance with federal law. The regulations
must:
(a) Establish standards for networks and technologies to be used
to maintain, transmit and exchange health information, including,
without limitation, standards:
(1) That require:
(I) The use of networks and technologies that allow
patients to access electronic health records directly from the health
care provider of the patient and forward such electronic health
records electronically to other persons and entities; and
(II) The interoperability of such networks and
technologies in accordance with the applicable standards for the
interoperability of Qualified Health Information Networks
prescribed by the Office of the National Coordinator for Health
Information Technology of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services;
(2) To ensure that electronic health records retained or shared
are secure;
(3) To maintain the confidentiality of electronic health
records and health-related information, including, without
limitation, standards to maintain the confidentiality of electronic
health records relating to a child who has received health care
services without the consent of a parent or guardian and which
ensure that a child’s right to access such health care services is not
impaired;
(4) To ensure the privacy of individually identifiable health
information, including, without limitation, standards to ensure the
privacy of information relating to a child who has received health
care services without the consent of a parent or guardian;
(5) For obtaining consent from a patient before retrieving the
patient’s health records from a health information exchange,
-
*SB495_R1*

– 10 –
including, without limitation, standards for obtaining such consent
from a child who has received health care services without the
consent of a parent or guardian;
(6) For making any necessary corrections to information or
records;
(7) For notifying a patient if the confidentiality of
information contained in an electronic health record of the patient is
breached;
(8) Governing the ownership, management and use of
electronic health records, health-related information and related
data; and
(9) For the electronic transmission of prior authorizations for
prescription medication;
(b) Ensure compliance with the requirements, specifications and
protocols for exchanging, securing and disclosing electronic health
records, health-related information and related data prescribed
pursuant to the provisions of the Health Information Technology for
Economic and Clinical Health Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 300jj et seq. and
17901 et seq., the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and other applicable federal and
state law; and
(c) Be based on nationally recognized best practices for
maintaining, transmitting and exchanging health information
electronically.
2. The standards prescribed pursuant to this section must
include, without limitation:
(a) Requirements for the creation, maintenance and transmittal
of electronic health records;
(b) Requirements for protecting confidentiality, including
control over, access to and the collection, organization and
maintenance of electronic health records, health-related information
and individually identifiable health information;
(c) Requirements for the manner in which a patient may,
through a health care provider who participates in the sharing of
health records using a health information exchange, revoke his or
her consent for a health care provider to retrieve the patient’s health
records from the health information exchange;
(d) A secure and traceable electronic audit system for
identifying access points and trails to electronic health records and
health information exchanges; and
(e) Any other requirements necessary to comply with all
applicable federal laws relating to electronic health records, health-
related information, health information exchanges and the security
and confidentiality of such records and exchanges.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 11 –
3. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section must not
require any person or entity to use a health information exchange.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5, 6 and 7, the
Department and the divisions thereof, other state and local
governmental entities, medical facilities, high-level providers of
health care , [providers,] third parties, pharmacy benefit managers
and other entities licensed or certified pursuant to title 57 of NRS
shall maintain, transmit and exchange health information in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section, the
provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act and any other regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
5. The Federal Government and employees thereof, a provider
of health coverage for federal employees, a provider of health
coverage that is subject to the Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., or a Taft-Hartley
trust formed pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 186(c)(5) is not required to but
may maintain, transmit and exchange electronic information in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.
6. A high-level provider of health care [provider] may apply to
the Department for a waiver from the provisions of subsection 4 on
the basis that the high-level provider of health care [provider] does
not have the infrastructure necessary to comply with those
provisions, including, without limitation, because the health care
provider does not have access to the Internet. The Department shall
grant a waiver if it determines that:
(a) The high-level provider of health care [provider] does not
currently have the infrastructure necessary to comply with the
provisions of subsection 4; and
(b) Obtaining such infrastructure is not reasonably practicable,
including, without limitation, because the cost of such infrastructure
would make it difficult for the high-level provider of health care
[provider] to continue to operate.
7. The provisions of subsection 4 do not apply to [the] :
(a) The Department of Corrections [.] ;
(b) A high-level provider of health care whose solo practice
provided care to fewer than 500 patients during the immediately
preceding year and reasonably expects to provide care to fewer
than 500 patients during the current year; or
(c) A high-level provider of health care who, in combination
with all other members of his or her group practice provided care
to fewer than 500 patients during the immediately preceding year
and reasonably expects to provide care to fewer than 500 patients
during the current year.
8. A high-level provider of health care described in
paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 7 shall furnish the medical
-
*SB495_R1*

– 12 –
records of a patient electronically to the patient or, upon the
request of the patient, another person or entity, in accordance with
NRS 629.062.
9. A violation of the provisions of this section or any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto is not a misdemeanor.
[9.] 10. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 683A.174.
[(b)] (c) “Third party” means any insurer, governmental entity
or other organization providing health coverage or benefits in
accordance with state or federal law.
Sec. 3.6. NRS 439.589 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.589 1. The Director, in consultation with health care
providers, third parties and other interested persons and entities,
shall by regulation prescribe a framework for the electronic
maintenance, transmittal and exchange of electronic health records,
prescriptions, health-related information and electronic signatures
and requirements for electronic equivalents of written entries or
written approvals in accordance with federal law. The regulations
must:
(a) Establish standards for networks and technologies to be used
to maintain, transmit and exchange health information, including,
without limitation, standards:
(1) That require:
(I) The use of networks and technologies that allow
patients to access electronic health records directly from the health
care provider of the patient and forward such electronic health
records electronically to other persons and entities; and
(II) The interoperability of such networks and
technologies in accordance with the applicable standards for the
interoperability of Qualified Health Information Networks
prescribed by the Office of the National Coordinator for Health
Information Technology of the United States Department of Health
and Human Services;
(2) To ensure that electronic health records retained or shared
are secure;
(3) To maintain the confidentiality of electronic health
records and health-related information, including, without
limitation, standards to maintain the confidentiality of electronic
health records relating to a child who has received health care
services without the consent of a parent or guardian and which
ensure that a child’s right to access such health care services is not
impaired;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 13 –
(4) To ensure the privacy of individually identifiable health
information, including, without limitation, standards to ensure the
privacy of information relating to a child who has received health
care services without the consent of a parent or guardian;
(5) For obtaining consent from a patient before retrieving the
patient’s health records from a health information exchange,
including, without limitation, standards for obtaining such consent
from a child who has received health care services without the
consent of a parent or guardian;
(6) For making any necessary corrections to information or
records;
(7) For notifying a patient if the confidentiality of
information contained in an electronic health record of the patient is
breached;
(8) Governing the ownership, management and use of
electronic health records, health-related information and related
data; and
(9) For the electronic transmission of prior authorizations for
prescription medication;
(b) Ensure compliance with the requirements, specifications and
protocols for exchanging, securing and disclosing electronic health
records, health-related information and related data prescribed
pursuant to the provisions of the Health Information Technology for
Economic and Clinical Health Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 300jj et seq. and
17901 et seq., the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability
Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, and other applicable federal and
state law; and
(c) Be based on nationally recognized best practices for
maintaining, transmitting and exchanging health information
electronically.
2. The standards prescribed pursuant to this section must
include, without limitation:
(a) Requirements for the creation, maintenance and transmittal
of electronic health records;
(b) Requirements for protecting confidentiality, including
control over, access to and the collection, organization and
maintenance of electronic health records, health-related information
and individually identifiable health information;
(c) Requirements for the manner in which a patient may,
through a health care provider who participates in the sharing of
health records using a health information exchange, revoke his or
her consent for a health care provider to retrieve the patient’s health
records from the health information exchange;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 14 –
(d) A secure and traceable electronic audit system for
identifying access points and trails to electronic health records and
health information exchanges; and
(e) Any other requirements necessary to comply with all
applicable federal laws relating to electronic health records, health-
related information, health information exchanges and the security
and confidentiality of such records and exchanges.
3. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section must not
[require] :
(a) Require any person or entity to use a health information
exchange [.] ; or
(b) Authorize a person or entity described in subsection 4 to
comply with the requirements of that subsection by:
(1) Connecting with a health information exchange; or
(2) Utilizing any other service that charges a fee to such a
person or entity or a patient for providing electronic health
records to a patient upon request in violation of NRS 629.062.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 5, 6 and 7, the
Department and the divisions thereof, other state and local
governmental entities, medical facilities, high-level providers of
health care, third parties, pharmacy benefit managers and other
entities licensed or certified pursuant to title 57 of NRS shall
maintain, transmit and exchange health information in accordance
with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section, the provisions
of NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 1 of this act and
any other regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
5. The Federal Government and employees thereof, a provider
of health coverage for federal employees, a provider of health
coverage that is subject to the Employee Retirement Income
Security Act of 1974, 29 U.S.C. §§ 1001 et seq., or a Taft-Hartley
trust formed pursuant to 29 U.S.C. § 186(c)(5) is not required to but
may maintain, transmit and exchange electronic information in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to this section.
6. A high-level provider of health care may apply to the
Department for a waiver from the provisions of subsection 4 on
the basis that the high-level provider of health care does not have
the infrastructure necessary to comply with those provisions,
including, without limitation, because the health care provider does
not have access to the Internet. The Department shall grant a waiver
if it determines that:
(a) The high-level provider of health care does not currently
have the infrastructure necessary to comply with the provisions of
subsection 4; and
(b) Obtaining such infrastructure is not reasonably practicable,
including, without limitation, because the cost of such infrastructure
-
*SB495_R1*

– 15 –
would make it difficult for the high-level provider of health care to
continue to operate.
7. The provisions of subsection 4 do not apply to:
(a) The Department of Corrections;
(b) A high-level provider of health care whose solo practice
provided care to fewer than 500 patients during the immediately
preceding year and reasonably expects to provide care to fewer than
500 patients during the current year; or
(c) A high-level provider of health care who, in combination
with all other members of his or her group practice provided care to
fewer than 500 patients during the immediately preceding year and
reasonably expects to provide care to fewer than 500 patients during
the current year.
8. A high-level provider of health care described in paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 7 shall furnish the medical records of a
patient electronically to the patient or, upon the request of the
patient, another person or entity, in accordance with NRS 629.062.
9. A violation of the provisions of this section or any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto is not a misdemeanor.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Pharmacy benefit manager” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 683A.174.
(c) “Third party” means any insurer, governmental entity or
other organization providing health coverage or benefits in
accordance with state or federal law.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4.5. NRS 439.5895 is hereby amended to read as follows:
439.5895 1. The Department shall notify each regulatory
body of this State that has issued a current, valid license to a
licensed provider or insurer if:
(a) The Department determines that the licensed provider or
insurer is not in compliance with the requirements of subsection 4 of
NRS 439.589 [;] and
[(b) The] the licensed provider or insurer:
(1) Is not exempt from those requirements pursuant to
subsection 5 of NRS 439.589; and
(2) Has not received a waiver of those requirements pursuant
to subsection 6 of NRS 439.589 [.] ; or
(b) The licensed provider or insurer is a high-level provider of
health care who is exempt from the requirements of subsection 4
of NRS 439.589 pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 7
of NRS 439.589 and the Department determines that the high-level
-
*SB495_R1*

– 16 –
provider of health care is not in compliance with subsection 8 of
NRS 439.589.
2. If the Department determines that a licensed provider or
insurer for which notice was previously provided pursuant to
subsection 1 has come into compliance with the requirements of
subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, the Department shall immediately
notify the regulatory body that issued the license.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “License” means any license, certificate, registration, permit
or similar type of authorization to practice an occupation or
profession or engage in a business in this State issued to a licensed
provider or insurer.
(b) “Licensed provider or insurer” means:
(1) A medical facility licensed pursuant to chapter 449 of
NRS;
(2) [The holder of a permit to operate an ambulance, an air
ambulance or a vehicle of a fire-fighting agency pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS;
(3)] A provider of health care, as defined in NRS 629.031,
who is licensed pursuant to title 54 of NRS; or
[(4)] (3) Any person licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS.
(c) “Regulatory body” means any governmental entity that
issues a license.
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5.5. Chapter 439A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 7 to 10.5, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 6. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 7. 1. On or before July 1 of each even-numbered year,
the Department, in collaboration with the Health Care Workforce
Working Group established pursuant to NRS 439A.118, shall:
(a) Conduct a comprehensive assessment of needs with regard
to the health care workforce in this State; and
(b) Compile a report of the results of the assessment and
submit the report to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services and the next
regular session of the Legislature.
2. The assessment conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 must consist of:
(a) A quantitative analysis of the health care workforce in this
State, including, without limitation:
(1) A determination of the total number of providers of
health care in this State and the total number of providers of
-
*SB495_R1*

– 17 –
health care in this State who practice different professions and
different specialties within those professions;
(2) A determination of the total number of providers of
health care who practice in different geographic areas of this State
and the total number of providers of health care who practice
different professions and different specialties within those
geographic areas; and
(3) A comparison of the numbers of providers of health
care identified pursuant to subparagraphs (1) and (2) with
benchmarks established by the Health Resources and Services
Administration of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services or nationally recognized organizations that
prescribe such benchmarks;
(b) A determination of the most critical shortages in the health
care workforce of this State, prioritizing:
(1) Essential health care professions and specialties and
essential clinical services or expertise currently experiencing
shortages; and
(2) Geographic areas of this State that are experiencing the
most critical shortages of providers of health care or clinical
services or expertise;
(c) An identification of unmet needs for specific health
technology and therapies, including, without limitation, genomic
testing, clinical trials, cellular therapies and palliative care; and
(d) A determination of any areas where there is an oversupply
of providers of health care, including, without limitation,
specialists or clinical services.
3. The report compiled pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
(a) A summary of the assessment conducted pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, including, without limitation:
(1) An analysis of shortages of providers of health care,
shortages of clinical services or expertise and unmet health needs
in this State; and
(2) A description of shortages of providers of health care
and the shortages of clinical services or expertise by geographic
region, including rural and urban areas; and
(b) Recommendations for legislation and regulatory changes
to improve the recruitment and retention of providers of health
care.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Palliative care” means a multidisciplinary and patient-
and family-centered approach to specialized medical care for a
person with a serious illness, which approach focuses on the care
of a patient throughout the continuum of an illness and involves
-
*SB495_R1*

– 18 –
addressing the physical, emotional, social and spiritual needs of
the patient, as well as facilitating patient autonomy, access to
information and choice of care. The term includes, without
limitation, discussion of the goals of the patient for treatment and
discussion of treatment options appropriate to the patient,
including, where appropriate, hospice care and comprehensive
management of pain and symptoms.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 8.5. “Independent center for emergency medical care”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.013.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9.5. 1. The Department shall establish and maintain a
program to increase public awareness of health care information
concerning the independent centers for emergency medical care in
this State. The program must be designed to assist consumers with
comparing the quality of care provided by the independent centers
for emergency medical care in this State and the charges for that
care.
2. The program must include, without limitation, the
collection, maintenance and provision of information concerning:
(a) Patients of each independent center for emergency medical
care in this State as reported in the forms submitted pursuant to
NRS 449.485;
(b) The quality of care provided by each independent center
for emergency medical care in this State as determined by
applying measures of quality endorsed by the entities described in
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 10.5
of this act, expressed as a number of events and rate of
occurrence, if such measures can be applied to the information
reported in the forms submitted pursuant to NRS 449.485;
(c) How consistently each independent center for emergency
medical care follows recognized practices to prevent the infection
of patients, to speed the recovery of patients and to avoid medical
complications of patients;
(d) The total number of patients discharged from the
independent center for emergency medical care and the total
number of potentially preventable readmissions to a hospital or
independent center for emergency medical care, which must be
expressed as a total number and a rate of occurrence of potentially
preventable readmissions, and the average length of stay and the
average billed charges for those potentially preventable
readmissions; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 19 –
(e) Any other information relating to the charges imposed and
the quality of the services provided by the independent centers for
emergency medical care in this State which the Department
determines is:
(1) Useful to consumers;
(2) Nationally recognized; and
(3) Reported in a standard and reliable manner.
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10.5. 1. The Department shall, by regulation:
(a) Prescribe the information that each independent center for
emergency medical care in this State must submit to the
Department for the program established pursuant to section 9.5 of
this act.
(b) Prescribe the measures of quality for independent centers
for emergency medical care that are required pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of section 9.5 of this act. In adopting
the regulations, the Department shall:
(1) Use the measures of quality endorsed by the Agency for
Healthcare Research and Quality, the National Quality Forum,
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services, a quality
improvement organization of the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services and the Joint Commission;
(2) Prescribe a reasonable number of measures of quality
which must not be unduly burdensome on the independent centers
for emergency medical care; and
(3) Take into consideration the financial burden placed on
the independent centers for emergency medical care to comply
with the regulations.
(c) Prescribe the manner in which an independent center for
emergency medical care must determine whether the readmission
of a patient must be reported pursuant to section 9.5 of this act as
a potentially preventable readmission and prescribe the form for
submission of such information.
(d) Require each independent center for emergency medical
care to provide the information prescribed in paragraphs (a), (b)
and (c) in the format required by the Department.
2. The information required pursuant to this section and
section 9.5 of this act must be submitted to the Department not
later than 45 days after the last day of each calendar month.
3. If an independent center for emergency medical care fails
to submit the information required pursuant to this section or
section 9.5 of this act or submits information that is incomplete or
inaccurate, the Department shall send a notice of such failure to
-
*SB495_R1*

– 20 –
the independent center for emergency medical care and to the
Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department.
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.2. NRS 439A.020 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439A.020 The purposes of this chapter are to:
1. Promote equal access to quality health care at a reasonable
cost;
2. Promote an adequate supply and distribution of health
resources;
3. Promote uniform, effective methods of delivering health
care;
4. Promote and encourage the adequate distribution of health
and care facilities and human resources;
5. Promote and encourage the effective use of methods for
controlling increases in the cost of health care;
6. Encourage participation in health planning by members of
the several health professions, representatives of institutions and
agencies interested in the provision of health care and the reduction
of the cost of such care, and the general public;
7. Utilize the viewpoint of the general public for making
decisions;
8. Provide information to the general public concerning the
charges imposed and the quality of the services provided by the
hospitals , [and] surgical centers for ambulatory patients and
independent centers for emergency medical care in this State;
9. Encourage public education regarding proper personal health
care and methods for the effective use of available health services;
and
10. Promote a program of technical assistance to purchasers to
contain effectively the cost of health care, including:
(a) Providing information to purchasers regarding the charges
made by practitioners.
(b) Training purchasers to negotiate successfully for a policy of
health insurance.
(c) Conducting studies and providing other information about
measures to assist purchasers in containing the cost of health care.
Sec. 11.5. NRS 439A.200 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439A.200 As used in NRS 439A.200 to 439A.290, inclusive,
and sections 8.5, 9.5 and 10.5 of this act unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 439A.205,
439A.207 and 439A.210 and section 8.5 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB495_R1*

– 21 –
Sec. 12.5. NRS 439A.260 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439A.260 1. The Department shall collect and maintain all
information that it receives from the hospitals , [and] surgical
centers for ambulatory patients and independent centers for
emergency medical care in this State pursuant to NRS 439A.220 to
439A.250, inclusive [.] and sections 8.5, 9.5 and 10.5 of this act.
Upon request, the Department shall make a summary of the
information available to:
(a) Consumers of health care;
(b) Providers of health care;
(c) Representatives of the health insurance industry; and
(d) The general public.
2. The Department shall ensure that the information it provides
pursuant to this section is aggregated so as not to reveal the identity
of a specific inpatient or outpatient of a hospital , [or] of a surgical
center for ambulatory patients [.] or of an independent center for
emergency medical care.
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13.5. NRS 439A.270 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439A.270 1. The Department shall establish and maintain an
Internet website that includes the information concerning the
charges imposed and the quality of the services provided by the
hospitals , [and] surgical centers for ambulatory patients and
independent centers for emergency medical care in this State as
required by the programs established pursuant to NRS 439A.220
and 439A.240 [.] and section 9.5 of this act. The information must:
(a) Include, for each hospital in this State, the:
(1) Total number of patients discharged, the average length
of stay and the average billed charges, reported for the diagnosis-
related groups for inpatients and the 50 medical treatments for
outpatients that the Department determines are most useful for
consumers;
(2) Total number of potentially preventable readmissions
reported pursuant to NRS 439A.220, the rate of occurrence of
potentially preventable readmissions, and the average length of stay
and average billed charges of those potentially preventable
readmissions, reported by the diagnosis-related group for inpatients
for which the patient originally received treatment at a hospital; and
(3) Name of each physician who performed a surgical
procedure in the hospital and the total number of surgical
procedures performed by each physician in the hospital, reported for
the most frequent surgical procedures that the Department
-
*SB495_R1*

– 22 –
determines are most useful for consumers if the information is
available;
(b) Include, for each surgical center for ambulatory patients in
this State, the:
(1) Total number of patients discharged and the average
billed charges, reported for 50 medical treatments for outpatients
that the Department determines are most useful for consumers; and
(2) Name of each physician who performed a surgical
procedure in the surgical center for ambulatory patients and the total
number of surgical procedures performed by each physician in the
surgical center for ambulatory patients, reported for the most
frequent surgical procedures that the Department determines are
most useful for consumers;
(c) Include, for each independent center for emergency
medical care in this State, the:
(1) Total number of patients discharged and the average
billed charges, reported for the 50 medical treatments for patients
of independent centers for emergency medical care that the
Department determines are most useful for consumers; and
(2) Total number of potentially preventable readmissions
reported pursuant to section 9.5 of this act, the rate of occurrence
of potentially preventable readmissions, and the average length of
stay and average billed charges of those potentially preventable
readmissions, reported for the diagnosis for which the patient
originally received treatment at an independent center for
emergency medical care;
(d) Be presented in a manner that allows a person to view and
compare the information for the hospitals by:
(1) Geographic location of each hospital;
(2) Type of medical diagnosis; and
(3) Type of medical treatment;
[(d)] (e) Be presented in a manner that allows a person to view
and compare the information for the surgical centers for ambulatory
patients by:
(1) Geographic location of each surgical center for
ambulatory patients;
(2) Type of medical diagnosis; and
(3) Type of medical treatment;
[(e)] (f) Be presented in a manner that allows a person to view
and compare the information for the independent centers for
emergency medical care by:
(1) Geographic location of each independent center for
emergency medical care;
(2) Type of medical diagnosis; and
(3) Type of medical treatment;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 23 –
(g) Be presented in a manner that allows a person to view and
compare the information separately for:
(1) The inpatients and outpatients of each hospital; [and]
(2) The outpatients of each surgical center for ambulatory
patients; and
(3) The patients of each independent center for emergency
medical care;
[(f)] (h) Be readily accessible and understandable by a member
of the general public;
[(g)] (i) Include the annual summary of reports of sentinel
events prepared for each health facility pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 1 of NRS 439.840;
[(h)] (j) Include the annual summary of reports of sentinel
events prepared pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of
NRS 439.840;
[(i)] (k) Include the reports of information prepared for each
medical facility pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of
NRS 439.847;
[(j)] (l) Include a link to electronic copies of all reports,
summaries, compilations and supplementary reports required by
NRS 449.450 to 449.530, inclusive;
[(k)] (m) Include, for each hospital with 100 or more beds, a
summary of financial information which is readily understandable
by a member of the general public and which includes, without
limitation, a summary of:
(1) The expenses of the hospital which are attributable to
providing community benefits and in-kind services as reported
pursuant to NRS 449.490;
(2) The capital improvement report submitted to the
Department pursuant to NRS 449.490;
(3) The net income of the hospital;
(4) The net income of the consolidated corporation, if the
hospital is owned by such a corporation and if that information is
publicly available;
(5) The operating margin of the hospital;
(6) The ratio of the cost of providing care to patients covered
by Medicare to the charges for such care;
(7) The ratio of the total costs to charges of the hospital; and
(8) The average daily occupancy of the hospital; and
[(l)] (n) Provide any other information relating to the charges
imposed and the quality of the services provided by the hospitals ,
[and] surgical centers for ambulatory patients and independent
centers for emergency medical care in this State which the
Department determines is:
(1) Useful to consumers;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 24 –
(2) Nationally recognized; and
(3) Reported in a standard and reliable manner.
2. The Department shall:
(a) Publicize the availability of the Internet website;
(b) Update the information contained on the Internet website at
least quarterly;
(c) Ensure that the information contained on the Internet website
is accurate and reliable;
(d) Ensure that the information reported by a hospital , [or]
surgical center for ambulatory patients or independent center for
emergency medical care for inpatients and outpatients which is
contained on the Internet website is expressed as a total number and
as a rate, and [must be] is reported in a manner so as not to reveal
the identity of a specific inpatient or outpatient of a hospital , [or]
surgical center for ambulatory patients [;] or independent center for
emergency medical care;
(e) Post a disclaimer on the Internet website indicating that the
information contained on the website is provided to assist with the
comparison of hospitals and independent centers for emergency
medical care and is not a guarantee by the Department or its
employees as to the charges imposed by the hospitals and
independent centers for emergency medical care in this State or the
quality of the services provided by the hospitals and independent
centers for emergency medical care in this State, including, without
limitation, an explanation that the actual amount charged to a person
by a particular hospital or independent center for emergency
medical care may not be the same charge as posted on the website
for that hospital [;] or independent center for emergency medical
care.
(f) Provide on the Internet website established pursuant to this
section a link to the Internet website of the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services; and
(g) Upon request, make the information that is contained on the
Internet website available in printed form.
3. As used in this section, “diagnosis-related group” means
groupings of medical diagnostic categories used as a basis for
hospital payment schedules by Medicare and other third-party health
care plans.
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB495_R1*

– 25 –
Sec. 19. Chapter 449 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 20, 21 and 22 of this act.
Sec. 20. 1. A medical facility to which a third party
delegates credentialing functions shall comply with the provisions
of section 50 or 109 of this act, where applicable.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Credentialing” means verifying the credentials of a
provider of health care for the purpose of determining whether the
provider of health care meets the requirements for participation in
the network of a third party or participation in Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program as a provider of services.
(b) “Network” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.640.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(d) “Third party”:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
means any insurer or organization providing health coverage or
benefits in accordance with state or federal law.
(2) Does not include:
(I) A plan that is subject to the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974 or any information relating to such
coverage; or
(II) Health coverage provided by a local government
agency through a self-insurance reserve fund pursuant to
NRS 287.010.
Sec. 21. 1. A hospital shall, for at least 95 percent of the
complete requests for privileging submitted by providers of health
care to the hospital, process the request not later than 60 days
after the hospital receives all information necessary to complete
the request.
2. Not later than 15 days after a hospital receives an
incomplete request for privileging from a provider of health care,
the hospital shall notify the provider of health care of the
information necessary to complete the request.
3. A hospital shall immediately notify the Division of:
(a) Any delay in privileging that exceeds the time period
specified in subsection 1;
(b) Steps taken to ensure that the request that is subject to the
delay is processed as quickly as possible; and
(c) An anticipated timeline to complete the processing of the
request.
4. On or before February 1 of each year, a hospital shall
compile and submit to the Division a report on the privileging of
providers of health care which includes, without limitation:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 26 –
(a) The average time between the submission by a provider of
health care of a request for privileging and the request being
approved or denied;
(b) The rates at which the hospital processes requests for
privileging within the time period specified in subsection 1; and
(c) Any planned improvements to the hospital’s process for
privileging providers of health care, including, without limitation,
improvements to technology or procedures to increase the
efficiency of the process.
5. As used in this section, “privileging” means the process of
determining whether to authorize a provider of health care to
provide specific services at a hospital based on his or her
credentials and qualifications.
Sec. 22. 1. A hospital or surgical center for ambulatory
patients shall submit requests for prior authorization to third
parties using the electronic systems implemented pursuant to
sections 57 and 101 of this act, where applicable.
2. As used in this section, “third party”:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), means any
insurer or organization providing health coverage or benefits in
accordance with state or federal law.
(b) Does not include:
(1) A plan that is subject to the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974 or any information relating to such
coverage; or
(2) Health coverage provided by a local government agency
through a self-insurance reserve fund pursuant to NRS 287.010.
Sec. 22.5. NRS 449.013 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.013 “Independent center for emergency medical care”
means a facility, structurally separate [and distinct] from a hospital,
which provides [limited] services for the treatment of a medical
emergency. The term includes, without limitation, such a facility
that is owned or operated by, or otherwise part of, a hospital but is
located more than 250 yards from the hospital.
Sec. 23. NRS 449.029 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.029 As used in NRS 449.029 to 449.240, inclusive, and
sections 20, 21 and 22 of this act, unless the context otherwise
requires, “medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS
449.0151 and includes a program of hospice care described in
NRS 449.196.
Sec. 24. NRS 449.0301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.0301 The provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, and sections 20, 21 and 22 of this act do not apply to:
1. Any facility conducted by and for the adherents of any
church or religious denomination for the purpose of providing
-
*SB495_R1*

– 27 –
facilities for the care and treatment of the sick who depend solely
upon spiritual means through prayer for healing in the practice of
the religion of the church or denomination, except that such a
facility shall comply with all regulations relative to sanitation and
safety applicable to other facilities of a similar category.
2. Foster homes as defined in NRS 424.014.
3. Any medical facility, facility for the dependent or facility
which is otherwise required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed that is operated and
maintained by the United States Government or an agency thereof.
Sec. 24.3. NRS 449.0308 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
449.0308 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Division may charge and collect from a medical facility, facility for
the dependent or facility which is required by the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed or a
person who operates such a facility without a license issued by the
Division the actual costs incurred by the Division for the
enforcement of the provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, and sections 20, 21 and 22 of this act including, without
limitation, the actual cost of conducting an inspection or
investigation of the facility.
2. The Division shall not charge and collect the actual cost for
enforcement pursuant to subsection 1 if the enforcement activity is:
(a) Related to the issuance or renewal of a license for which the
Board charges a fee pursuant to NRS 449.050 or 449.089; [or]
(b) Related to the issuance or renewal of a license to an
independent center for emergency medical care that is owned or
operated by, or otherwise part of, a hospital; or
(c) Conducted pursuant to an agreement with the Federal
Government which has appropriated money for that purpose.
3. Any money collected pursuant to subsection 1 may be used
by the Division to administer and carry out the provisions of NRS
449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and sections 20, 21 and 22 of this
act and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
4. The provisions of this section do not apply to any costs
incurred by the Division for the enforcement of the provisions of
NRS 449.24185, 449.2419 or 449.24195.
Sec. 24.5. NRS 449.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.050 1. [Each] Except as otherwise provided in this
section, each application for a license must be accompanied by such
fee as may be determined by regulation of the Board. The Board
may, by regulation, allow or require payment of a fee for a license in
installments and may fix the amount of each payment and the date
that the payment is due.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 28 –
2. The fee imposed by the Board for a facility for transitional
living for released offenders must be based on the type of facility
that is being licensed and must be calculated to produce the revenue
estimated to cover the costs related to the license, but in no case
may a fee for a license exceed the actual cost to the Division of
issuing or renewing the license.
3. If an application for a license for a facility for transitional
living for released offenders is denied, any amount of the fee paid
pursuant to this section that exceeds the expenses and costs incurred
by the Division must be refunded to the applicant.
4. The Board shall not require a fee for the issuance or
renewal of the license of an independent center for emergency
medical care that is owned or operated by, or otherwise part of, a
hospital.
Sec. 24.8. NRS 449.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.080 1. [If,] Except as otherwise provided in this section,
if, after investigation, the Division finds that the:
(a) Applicant is in full compliance with the provisions of NRS
449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive [;] , and sections 20, 21 and 22 of
this act;
(b) Applicant is in substantial compliance with the standards and
regulations adopted by the Board;
(c) Applicant, if he or she has undertaken a project for which
approval is required pursuant to NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102, has
obtained the approval of the Director of the Department of Health
and Human Services; and
(d) Facility conforms to the applicable zoning regulations,
 the Division shall issue the license to the applicant.
2. Any investigation of an applicant for a license to provide
community-based living arrangement services conducted pursuant
to subsection 1 must include, without limitation, an inspection of
any building operated by the applicant in which the applicant
proposes to provide community-based living arrangement services.
3. The Division may not issue a license to operate an
independent center for emergency medical care that is located
within a 5 mile radius of:
(a) An existing independent center for emergency medical
care; or
(b) A hospital with an emergency department.
4. A license applies only to the person to whom it is issued, is
valid only for the premises described in the license and is not
transferable.
Sec. 25. NRS 449.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.160 1. The Division may deny an application for a
license or may suspend or revoke any license issued under the
-
*SB495_R1*

– 29 –
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and sections 20,
21 and 22 of this act upon any of the following grounds:
(a) Violation by the applicant or the licensee of any of the
provisions of NRS 439B.410, 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive, and
sections 20, 21 and 22 of this act or 449A.100 to 449A.124,
inclusive, and 449A.270 to 449A.286, inclusive, or of any other law
of this State or of the standards, rules and regulations adopted
thereunder.
(b) Aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal
act.
(c) Conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare and
safety of the people of the State of Nevada in the maintenance and
operation of the premises for which a license is issued.
(d) Conduct or practice detrimental to the health or safety of the
occupants or employees of the facility.
(e) Failure of the applicant to obtain written approval from the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services as
required by NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102 or as provided in any
regulation adopted pursuant to NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive,
and sections 20, 21 and 22 of this act and 449.435 to 449.531,
inclusive, and chapter 449A of NRS if such approval is required,
including, without limitation, the closure or conversion of any
hospital in a county whose population is 100,000 or more that is
owned by the licensee without approval pursuant to NRS 439A.102.
(f) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto or NRS 449.2486.
(g) Violation of the provisions of NRS 458.112.
(h) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 449A.170 to
449A.192, inclusive, and any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
(i) Violation of the provisions of NRS 629.260.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1, the Division
may revoke a license to operate a facility for the dependent if, with
respect to that facility, the licensee that operates the facility, or an
agent or employee of the licensee:
(a) Is convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 202.470;
(b) Is ordered to but fails to abate a nuisance pursuant to NRS
244.360, 244.3603 or 268.4124; or
(c) Is ordered by the appropriate governmental agency to correct
a violation of a building, safety or health code or regulation but fails
to correct the violation.
3. The Division shall maintain a log of any complaints that it
receives relating to activities for which the Division may revoke the
license to operate a facility for the dependent pursuant to
-
*SB495_R1*

– 30 –
subsection 2. The Division shall provide to a facility for the care of
adults during the day:
(a) A summary of a complaint against the facility if the
investigation of the complaint by the Division either substantiates
the complaint or is inconclusive;
(b) A report of any investigation conducted with respect to the
complaint; and
(c) A report of any disciplinary action taken against the facility.
 The facility shall make the information available to the public
pursuant to NRS 449.2486.
4. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau a written report setting forth, for the previous biennium:
(a) Any complaints included in the log maintained by the
Division pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Any disciplinary actions taken by the Division pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 26. NRS 449.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.163 1. In addition to the payment of the amount required
by NRS 449.0308, if a medical facility, facility for the dependent or
facility which is required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed violates any provision
related to its licensure, including any provision of NRS 439B.410 or
449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and sections 20, 21 and 22 of this
act or any condition, standard or regulation adopted by the Board,
the Division, in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 449.165, may:
(a) Prohibit the facility from admitting any patient until it
determines that the facility has corrected the violation;
(b) Limit the occupancy of the facility to the number of beds
occupied when the violation occurred, until it determines that the
facility has corrected the violation;
(c) If the license of the facility limits the occupancy of the
facility and the facility has exceeded the approved occupancy,
require the facility, at its own expense, to move patients to another
facility that is licensed;
(d) Except where a greater penalty is authorized by subsection 2,
impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 per day
for each violation, together with interest thereon at a rate not to
exceed 10 percent per annum; and
(e) Appoint temporary management to oversee the operation of
the facility and to ensure the health and safety of the patients of the
facility, until:
(1) It determines that the facility has corrected the violation
and has management which is capable of ensuring continued
-
*SB495_R1*

– 31 –
compliance with the applicable statutes, conditions, standards and
regulations; or
(2) Improvements are made to correct the violation.
2. If an off-campus location of a hospital fails to obtain a
national provider identifier that is distinct from the national provider
identifier used by the main campus and any other off-campus
location of the hospital in violation of NRS 449.1818, the Division
may impose against the hospital an administrative penalty of not
more than $10,000 for each day of such failure, together with
interest thereon at a rate not to exceed 10 percent per annum, in
addition to any other action authorized by this chapter.
3. If the facility fails to pay any administrative penalty imposed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2, the
Division may:
(a) Suspend the license of the facility until the administrative
penalty is paid; and
(b) Collect court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other
costs incurred to collect the administrative penalty.
4. The Division may require any facility that violates any
provision of NRS 439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and
sections 20, 21 and 22 of this act or any condition, standard or
regulation adopted by the Board to make any improvements
necessary to correct the violation.
5. Any money collected as administrative penalties pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 must be accounted for
separately and used to administer and carry out the provisions of
NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive, and sections 20, 21 and 22 of
this act, 449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and chapter 449A of NRS to
protect the health, safety, well-being and property of the patients
and residents of facilities in accordance with applicable state and
federal standards or for any other purpose authorized by the
Legislature.
Sec. 26.5. NRS 449.1818 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
449.1818 1. Each off-campus location of a hospital shall
obtain and use and include on all claims for reimbursement or
payment for health care services provided at the location a national
provider identifier that is distinct from the national provider
identifier used by the main campus and any other off-campus
location of the hospital. If the off-campus location includes the
national provider identifier on such a claim, the off-campus location
may also include on the claim the national provider identifier used
by the main campus of the hospital. If the off-campus location
includes both the national provider identifier used by the off-campus
location and the national provider identifier used by the main
-
*SB495_R1*

– 32 –
campus on a claim, the claim must clearly identify which national
provider identifier corresponds to the off-campus location and
which national provider identifier corresponds to the main campus.
2. An independent center for emergency medical care shall
include on all claims for reimbursement or payment for health care
services provided at the independent center for emergency medical
care the national provider identifier used by the independent center
for emergency medical care.
3. An independent center for emergency medical care:
(a) Shall provide urgent care during all operating hours
through:
(1) A separate urgent care unit within the independent
center for emergency medical care; or
(2) A system that uses the severity of the patient’s condition
to determine whether the patient receives emergency services or
urgent care;
(b) Shall not charge more for urgent care than the amount
customarily charged for urgent care by an urgent care center;
(c) If urgent care services are sufficient to treat or manage the
condition of a patient, shall inform the patient that he or she may
receive urgent care rather than emergency services; and
(d) Shall not require a patient to wait longer to receive urgent
care services than a patient with the same condition would be
required to wait to receive emergency services.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “National provider identifier” means the standard, unique
health identifier for health care providers that is issued by the
national provider system in accordance with 45 C.F.R. Part 162.
(b) “Off-campus location” means a facility:
(1) With operations that are directly or indirectly owned or
controlled by, in whole or in part, a hospital or which is affiliated
with a hospital, regardless of whether it is operated by the same
governing body as the hospital;
(2) That is located more than 250 yards from the main
campus of the hospital;
(3) That provides services which are organizationally and
functionally integrated with the hospital; and
(4) That is an outpatient facility providing ambulatory
surgery, urgent care or emergency room services.
(c) “Urgent care” means health care that is furnished to a
person whose medical condition is sufficiently acute to require
treatment unavailable through, or inappropriate to be provided by,
a clinic or the office of a provider of health care, but not so acute
as to require treatment in an emergency room.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 33 –
Sec. 27. NRS 449.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.240 The district attorney of the county in which the facility
is located shall, upon application by the Division, institute and
conduct the prosecution of any action for violation of any provisions
of NRS 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive [.] , and sections 20, 21 and
22 of this act.
Sec. 27.3. NRS 449.485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.485 1. Each hospital and independent center for
emergency medical care in this State shall use for all patients
discharged a form prescribed by the Director and shall include in the
form all information required by the Department. Any form
prescribed by the Director must be a form that is commonly used
nationwide by hospitals [,] and independent centers for emergency
medical care, if applicable, and comply with federal laws and
regulations.
2. Each hospital and independent center for emergency
medical care in this State shall, on a monthly basis, report to the
Department the information required to be included in the form for
each patient. The information reported must be complete, accurate
and timely.
3. Each insurance company or other payer shall accept the form
as the bill for services provided by hospitals and independent
centers for emergency medical care in this State.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, each hospital
and independent center for emergency medical care in this State
shall provide the information required pursuant to subsection 2 in an
electronic form specified by the Department.
5. The Director may exempt a hospital or independent center
for emergency medical care from the requirements of subsection 4
if requiring the hospital or independent center for emergency
medical care to comply with the requirements would cause the
hospital financial hardship.
6. The Department shall use the information submitted
pursuant to this section for the [program] programs established
pursuant to NRS 439A.220 and section 9.5 of this act to increase
public awareness of health care information concerning the hospitals
and independent centers for emergency medical care, respectively,
in this State.
Sec. 27.7. NRS 449.520 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.520 1. On or before October 1 of each year, the Director
shall prepare and transmit to the Governor, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services and the Interim
Finance Committee a report of the Department’s operations and
activities for the preceding fiscal year.
2. The report prepared pursuant to subsection 1 must include:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 34 –
(a) Copies of all reports, summaries, compilations and
supplementary reports required by NRS 449.450 to 449.530,
inclusive, together with such facts, suggestions and policy
recommendations as the Director deems necessary;
(b) A summary of the trends of the audits of hospitals in this
State that the Department required or performed during the previous
year;
(c) An analysis of the trends in the costs, expenses and profits of
hospitals in this State;
(d) An analysis of the methodologies used to determine the
corporate home office allocation of hospitals in this State;
(e) An examination and analysis of the manner in which
hospitals are reporting the information that is required to be filed
pursuant to NRS 449.490, including, without limitation, an
examination and analysis of whether that information is being
reported in a standard and consistent manner, which fairly reflect the
operations of each hospital;
(f) A review and comparison of the policies and procedures used
by hospitals in this State to provide discounted services to, and to
reduce charges for services provided to, persons without health
insurance;
(g) A review and comparison of the policies and procedures
used by hospitals in this State to collect unpaid charges for services
provided by the hospitals; and
(h) A summary of the status of the programs established
pursuant to NRS 439A.220 and 439A.240 and section 9.5 of this
act to increase public awareness of health care information
concerning the hospitals , [and] surgical centers for ambulatory
patients and independent centers for emergency medical care in
this State, including, without limitation, the information that was
posted in the preceding fiscal year on the Internet website
maintained for those programs pursuant to NRS 439A.270.
3. The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Health and
Human Services shall develop a comprehensive plan concerning the
provision of health care in this State which includes, without
limitation:
(a) A review of the health care needs in this State as identified
by state agencies, local governments, providers of health care and
the general public; and
(b) A review of the capital improvement reports submitted by
hospitals pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 449.490.
Sec. 28. Chapter 450B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 29 and 30 of this act.
Sec. 29. 1. The State Board of Health shall adopt
regulations authorizing paramedics to be employed by or volunteer
-
*SB495_R1*

– 35 –
in hospitals, including, without limitation, emergency
departments, intensive care units and other areas for acute or
specialty care.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section must:
(a) Ensure that paramedics who are employed by or volunteer
in hospitals perform their duties in a manner that enhances the
care of patients while maintaining the safety of patients;
(b) Prescribe the duties and responsibilities of a paramedic
who is employed by or volunteering in a hospital, which must vary
depending on the training and experience of the paramedic;
(c) Prescribe standards of training for a paramedic who is
employed by or volunteering in a hospital, including, without
limitation:
(1) Any certifications that such a paramedic must hold; and
(2) Any additional training required for paramedics who
work in specialty areas or provide care to patient with severe
conditions or urgent needs; and
(d) Establish specific protocols for the oversight and periodic
evaluation of paramedics who are employed by or are volunteering
in hospitals in a manner that ensures compliance with the
regulations adopted pursuant to this section and the policies
developed pursuant to section 30 of this act.
Sec. 30. 1. A hospital that employs paramedics or accepts
paramedics as volunteers pursuant to section 29 of this act must
develop and implement comprehensive written policies that:
(a) Define the scope of duties of such paramedics within the
hospital in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
section 29 of this act;
(b) Establish procedures governing the supervision of such
paramedics within the hospital in accordance with the regulations
adopted pursuant to section 29 of this act, including, without
limitation, procedures for:
(1) The delegation of tasks to such paramedics by
physicians, nurses and other qualified providers of health care;
and
(2) The review by providers of health care described in
subparagraph (1) of tasks performed by such paramedics;
(c) Ensure compliance with applicable standards for
accreditation and the safety of patients and state and federal law
and regulations, including, without limitation, procedures for
internal reviews and audits of the duties of such paramedics to
ensure adherence to such standards, laws and regulations; and
(d) Establish protocols to document the outcomes of patients
who receive services from such paramedics.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 36 –
2. On or before February 1 of each year, a hospital that
employs paramedics or accepts paramedics as volunteers shall
submit to the State Board of Health a report that includes, without
limitation:
(a) A description of the roles performed by such paramedics
within the hospital, including, without limitation, data on the types
of services provided by such paramedics;
(b) Metrics on the outcomes of patients who receive services
from such paramedics in acute care settings;
(c) Challenges encountered during the integration of such
paramedics into the hospital, best practices established concerning
the performance of duties by and oversight of such paramedics
and areas for improvement related to the performance of duties by
and oversight of such paramedics; and
(d) A description to any changes made by the hospital to the
policies developed pursuant to subsection 1 in response to the
information described in paragraph (c).
Sec. 31. NRS 450B.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450B.250 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a
person shall not serve as an attendant on any ambulance or air
ambulance and a firefighter shall not provide the level of medical
care provided by an advanced emergency medical technician or
paramedic to sick or injured persons at the scene of an emergency or
while transporting those persons to a medical facility unless the
person holds a currently valid license issued by the health authority
under the provisions of this chapter.
2. A person shall not provide community paramedicine
services unless the person:
(a) Is certified as an emergency medical technician, an advanced
emergency medical technician or a paramedic;
(b) Is employed by or serves as a volunteer for a person or
governmental entity which has a currently valid permit with an
endorsement to provide community paramedicine services issued by
the health authority pursuant to NRS 450B.1993; and
(c) Meets the qualifications and has satisfied any training
required by regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 450B.1993.
3. A paramedic shall not serve as an employee or volunteer of
a hospital unless:
(a) The paramedic meets the qualifications and has satisfied
any training required by the regulations adopted pursuant to
section 29 of this act; and
(b) The hospital has developed and implemented the
comprehensive policies required by section 30 of this act.
4. A paramedic who serves as an employee or volunteer of a
hospital shall not work in an area for which additional training is
-
*SB495_R1*

– 37 –
required pursuant to section 29 of this act unless the paramedic
has received such additional training.
Sec. 32. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 32.5. NRS 179.301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.301 1. The Nevada Gaming Control Board and the
Nevada Gaming Commission and their employees, agents and
representatives may inquire into and inspect any records sealed
pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255, if the event or conviction was
related to gaming, to determine the suitability or qualifications of
any person to hold a state gaming license, manufacturer’s, seller’s or
distributor’s license or registration as a gaming employee pursuant
to chapter 463 of NRS. Events and convictions, if any, which are the
subject of an order sealing records:
(a) May form the basis for recommendation, denial or
revocation of those licenses.
(b) Must not form the basis for denial or rejection of a gaming
work permit unless the event or conviction relates to the applicant’s
suitability or qualifications to hold the work permit.
2. The Division of Insurance of the Department of Business
and Industry and its employees may inquire into and inspect any
records sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255, if the event or
conviction was related to insurance, to determine the suitability
or qualifications of any person to hold a license, certification or
authorization issued in accordance with title 57 of NRS. Events and
convictions, if any, which are the subject of an order sealing records
may form the basis for recommendation, denial or revocation of
those licenses, certifications and authorizations.
3. The Department of Health and Human Services, the
Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department
and their employees, agents and representatives may inquire into
and inspect any records sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or
179.255, if the event or conviction was related to Medicare or
Medicaid or the provision of professional services for which a
license or certification is required. Such inquiry or inspection
must be for the purpose of determining the suitability of the
person to render such professional services as a provider of
services under Medicaid or to own or serve as an officer,
managing employee or managing agent of a business seeking to
enter into a contract with the Department or a health maintenance
organization with which the Department has entered into a
contract pursuant to NRS 422.273 for the provision of services
under Medicaid. Events and convictions, if any, which are the
subject of an order sealing records may form the basis of a
decision of the Department to refuse to enter into or terminate
such a contract.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 38 –
4. A prosecuting attorney may inquire into and inspect any
records sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 if:
(a) The records relate to a violation or alleged violation of NRS
202.485; and
(b) The person who is the subject of the records has been
arrested or issued a citation for violating NRS 202.485.
[4.] 5. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History and its employees may inquire into and inspect any records
sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 that constitute
information relating to sexual offenses, and may notify employers of
the information in accordance with federal laws and regulations.
[5.] 6. Records which have been sealed pursuant to NRS
179.245 or 179.255 and which are retained in the statewide registry
established pursuant to NRS 179B.200 may be inspected pursuant to
chapter 179B of NRS by an officer or employee of the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History or a law
enforcement officer in the regular course of his or her duties.
[6.] 7. The State Board of Pardons Commissioners and its
agents and representatives may inquire into and inspect any records
sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 if the person who is the
subject of the records has applied for a pardon from the Board.
[7.] 8. As used in this section:
(a) “Information relating to sexual offenses” means information
contained in or concerning a record relating in any way to a sexual
offense.
(b) “Sexual offense” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179A.073.
Sec. 33. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 34. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 35. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 36. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 37. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 38. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 39. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 40. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 41. NRS 232.320 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.320 1. The Director:
(a) Shall appoint, with the consent of the Governor,
administrators of the divisions of the Department, who are
respectively designated as follows:
(1) The Administrator of the Aging and Disability Services
Division;
(2) The Administrator of the Division of Welfare and
Supportive Services;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 39 –
(3) The Administrator of the Division of Child and Family
Services;
(4) The Administrator of the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy; and
(5) The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health.
(b) Shall administer, through the divisions of the Department,
the provisions of chapters 63, 424, 425, 427A, 432A to 442,
inclusive, 446 to 450, inclusive, 458A and 656A of NRS, NRS
127.220 to 127.310, inclusive, 422.001 to 422.410, inclusive, and
sections 49 to 63, inclusive, of this act, 422.580, 432.010 to
432.133, inclusive, 432B.6201 to 432B.626, inclusive, 444.002 to
444.430, inclusive, and 445A.010 to 445A.055, inclusive, and all
other provisions of law relating to the functions of the divisions of
the Department, but is not responsible for the clinical activities of
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health or the professional line
activities of the other divisions.
(c) Shall administer any state program for persons with
developmental disabilities established pursuant to the
Developmental Disabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act of
2000, 42 U.S.C. §§ 15001 et seq.
(d) Shall, after considering advice from agencies of local
governments and nonprofit organizations which provide social
services, adopt a master plan for the provision of human services in
this State. The Director shall revise the plan biennially and deliver a
copy of the plan to the Governor and the Legislature at the
beginning of each regular session. The plan must:
(1) Identify and assess the plans and programs of the
Department for the provision of human services, and any
duplication of those services by federal, state and local agencies;
(2) Set forth priorities for the provision of those services;
(3) Provide for communication and the coordination of those
services among nonprofit organizations, agencies of local
government, the State and the Federal Government;
(4) Identify the sources of funding for services provided by
the Department and the allocation of that funding;
(5) Set forth sufficient information to assist the Department
in providing those services and in the planning and budgeting for the
future provision of those services; and
(6) Contain any other information necessary for the
Department to communicate effectively with the Federal
Government concerning demographic trends, formulas for the
distribution of federal money and any need for the modification of
programs administered by the Department.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 40 –
(e) May, by regulation, require nonprofit organizations and state
and local governmental agencies to provide information regarding
the programs of those organizations and agencies, excluding
detailed information relating to their budgets and payrolls, which the
Director deems necessary for the performance of the duties imposed
upon him or her pursuant to this section.
(f) Has such other powers and duties as are provided by law.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Director, or
the Director’s designee, is responsible for appointing and removing
subordinate officers and employees of the Department.
Sec. 41.5. NRS 232.459 is hereby amended to read as follows:
232.459 1. The Advocate shall:
(a) Respond to written and telephonic inquiries received from
consumers and injured employees regarding concerns and problems
related to health care and workers’ compensation;
(b) Assist consumers and injured employees in understanding
their rights and responsibilities under health care plans, including,
without limitation, the Public Employees’ Benefits Program and the
Public Option, and policies of industrial insurance;
(c) Identify and investigate complaints of consumers and injured
employees regarding their health care plans, including, without
limitation, the Public Employees’ Benefits Program and the Public
Option, and policies of industrial insurance and assist those
consumers and injured employees to resolve their complaints,
including, without limitation:
(1) Referring consumers and injured employees to the
appropriate agency, department or other entity that is responsible for
addressing the specific complaint of the consumer or injured
employee; and
(2) Providing counseling and assistance to consumers and
injured employees concerning health care plans, including, without
limitation, the Public Employees’ Benefits Program and the Public
Option, and policies of industrial insurance;
(d) Provide information to consumers and injured employees
concerning health care plans, including, without limitation, the
Public Employees’ Benefits Program and the Public Option, and
policies of industrial insurance in this State;
(e) Establish and maintain a system to collect and maintain
information pertaining to the written and telephonic inquiries
received by the Office for Consumer Health Assistance;
(f) Take such actions as are necessary to ensure public
awareness of the existence and purpose of the services provided by
the Advocate pursuant to this section;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 41 –
(g) In appropriate cases and pursuant to the direction of the
Advocate, refer a complaint or the results of an investigation to the
Attorney General for further action;
(h) Provide information to and applications for prescription drug
programs for consumers without insurance coverage for prescription
drugs or pharmaceutical services;
(i) Establish and maintain an Internet website which includes:
(1) Information concerning purchasing prescription drugs
from Canadian pharmacies that have been recommended by the
State Board of Pharmacy for inclusion on the Internet website
pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 639.2328;
(2) Links to websites of Canadian pharmacies which have
been recommended by the State Board of Pharmacy for inclusion on
the Internet website pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS 639.2328; and
(3) A link to the website established and maintained pursuant
to NRS 439A.270 which provides information to the general public
concerning the charges imposed and the quality of the services
provided by the hospitals , [and] surgical centers for ambulatory
patients and independent centers for emergency medical care in
this State;
(j) Assist consumers with accessing a navigator, case manager
or facilitator to help the consumer obtain health care services;
(k) Assist consumers with scheduling an appointment with a
provider of health care who is in the network of providers under
contract to provide services to participants in the health care plan
under which the consumer is covered;
(l) Assist consumers with filing complaints against health care
facilities and health care professionals;
(m) Assist consumers with filing complaints with the
Commissioner of Insurance against issuers of health care plans; and
(n) On or before January 31 of each year, compile a report of
aggregated information submitted to the Office for Consumer
Health Assistance pursuant to NRS 687B.675, aggregated for each
type of provider of health care for which such information is
provided and submit the report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(2) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature.
2. The Advocate may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section and NRS 232.461 and 232.462.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 162A.740.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 42 –
(b) “Navigator, case manager or facilitator” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 687B.675.
Sec. 42. NRS 233B.038 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.038 1. “Regulation” means:
(a) An agency rule, standard, directive or statement of general
applicability which effectuates or interprets law or policy, or
describes the organization, procedure or practice requirements of
any agency;
(b) A proposed regulation;
(c) The amendment or repeal of a prior regulation; and
(d) The general application by an agency of a written policy,
interpretation, process or procedure to determine whether a person is
in compliance with a federal or state statute or regulation in order to
assess a fine, monetary penalty or monetary interest.
2. The term does not include:
(a) A statement concerning only the internal management of an
agency and not affecting private rights or procedures available to the
public;
(b) A declaratory ruling;
(c) An intraagency memorandum;
(d) A manual of internal policies and procedures or audit
procedures of an agency which is used solely to train or provide
guidance to employees of the agency and which is not used as
authority in a contested case to determine whether a person is in
compliance with a federal or state statute or regulation;
(e) An agency decision or finding in a contested case;
(f) An advisory opinion issued by an agency that is not of
general applicability;
(g) A published opinion of the Attorney General;
(h) An interpretation of an agency that has statutory authority to
issue interpretations;
(i) Letters of approval, concurrence or disapproval issued in
relation to a permit for a specific project or activity;
(j) A contract or agreement into which an agency has entered;
(k) The provisions of a federal law, regulation or guideline;
(l) An emergency action taken by an agency that is necessary to
protect public health and safety;
(m) The application by an agency of a policy, interpretation,
process or procedure to a person who has sufficient prior actual
notice of the policy, interpretation, process or procedure to
determine whether the person is in compliance with a federal or
state statute or regulation in order to assess a fine, monetary penalty
or monetary interest;
(n) A regulation concerning the use of public roads or facilities
which is indicated to the public by means of signs, signals and other
-
*SB495_R1*

– 43 –
traffic-control devices that conform with the manual and
specifications for a uniform system of official traffic-control devices
adopted pursuant to NRS 484A.430;
(o) The classification of wildlife or the designation of seasons
for hunting, fishing or trapping by regulation of the Board of
Wildlife Commissioners pursuant to the provisions of title 45 of
NRS; [or]
(p) A technical bulletin prepared pursuant to NRS 360.133 [.] ;
or
(q) The assessment conducted by the Director of the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to section 7
of this act.
Sec. 42.5. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
-
*SB495_R1*

– 44 –
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
-
*SB495_R1*

– 45 –
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 89.9 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 46 –
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 43. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
-
*SB495_R1*

– 47 –
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, paragraphs
(b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6
and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033 to 689B.0369, inclusive,
689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive, 689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287
and 689B.500 and section 1 of this act apply to coverage provided
pursuant to this paragraph, except that the provisions of NRS
689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage for
active officers and employees of the governing body, or the
dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 48 –
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 44. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 45. NRS 287.0433 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.0433 1. The Board may establish a plan of life, accident
or health insurance and provide for the payment of contributions
into the Program Fund, a schedule of benefits and the disbursement
of benefits from the Program Fund. The Board may reinsure any
risk or any part of such a risk.
2. If the Board provides coverage of prescription drugs
pursuant to this section, the Board or any entity with which the
Board enters into a contract to provide such coverage may use the
list of preferred prescription drugs developed by the Department of
Health and Human Services pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
422.4025 as its formulary and obtain prescription drugs through the
purchasing agreements negotiated by the Department pursuant to
that section by notifying the Department in the form prescribed by
the Department.
3. The Board may not enter into a contract with a health
carrier, as defined in section 98 of this act, to perform any
function with regard to a plan of health insurance established
pursuant to subsection 1 unless the health carrier meets the
criteria prescribed by the regulations adopted pursuant to
subsection 2 of section 108 of this act.
Sec. 45.5. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of
-
*SB495_R1*

– 49 –
NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 1 of this act,
686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.409, 687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725,
687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255, 695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155,
695G.160, 695G.162, 695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645,
695G.1665, 695G.167, 695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712,
inclusive, 695G.1714 to 695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177,
695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive,
695G.405 and 695G.415, in the same manner as an insurer that is
licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required to comply with those
provisions.
Sec. 46. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, 686A.135,
687B.352, 687B.409, 687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805,
689B.0353, 689B.255, 695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160,
695G.162, 695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665,
695G.167, 695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive,
695G.1714 to 695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200
to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405
and 695G.415, and section 109 of this act in the same manner as an
insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required to
comply with those provisions.
Sec. 47. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, 686A.135,
paragraph (b) of subsection 2 and subsections 1 and 3 to 8,
inclusive, of NRS 687B.225, NRS 687B.352, 687B.409, 687B.692,
[687B.723,] 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, 695G.176, 695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230,
inclusive, 695G.241 to 695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and
695G.415, and [section] sections 97 to 109 , inclusive, of this act in
the same manner as an insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of
NRS is required to comply with those provisions.
Sec. 48. Chapter 422 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 49 to 63, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 49. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB495_R1*

– 50 –
Sec. 50. 1. The Department or any entity to which the
Department delegates credentialing functions for Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program shall:
(a) Use the Provider Data Portal, or any successor system,
established by the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare, or
its successor organization, to accept submissions by providers of
health care for credentialing; and
(b) Use an entity that holds the Credentials Verification
Organization Certification issued by the National Committee for
Quality Assurance, or its successor organization, for the purpose
of verifying the credentials of providers of health care seeking to
participate in Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program.
2. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department
shall:
(a) Compile a report on the credentialing of providers of
health care which includes, without limitation:
(1) The average time between the submission of a request
by a provider of health care for credentialing for Medicaid and the
Children’s Health Insurance Program during the immediately
preceding year and the request being approved or denied; and
(2) Recommendations for improvements to the process for
credentialing providers of health care for Medicaid and the
Children’s Health Insurance Program, including, without
limitation, recommendations concerning improvements to
technology or procedures to increase the efficiency of the process;
and
(b) Submit the report to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(2) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Credentialing” means verifying the credentials of a
provider of health care for the purpose of determining whether the
provider of health care meets the requirements for participation in
Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program as a
provider of services.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 51. 1. The Department shall:
(a) Take such measures as are necessary to facilitate the
determination required pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(47) by
personnel of hospitals who are certified by the Department of the
-
*SB495_R1*

– 51 –
presumptive eligibility of patients to receive benefits under
Medicaid.
(b) Apply to the United States Secretary of Health and Human
Services for any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment
of the State Plan for Medicaid that is necessary to authorize
personnel of qualified community-based organizations who are
certified by the Department to determine whether a person is
presumptively eligible to receive benefits under Medicaid.
(c) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirements of the
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment
pursuant to paragraph (b).
2. The Department shall establish a comprehensive program
to certify employees, contractors and volunteers of the entities
described in subsection 1 in determining whether a person is
presumptively eligible to receive benefits under Medicaid. The
program must include, without limitation, training concerning:
(a) Eligibility criteria for different categories of persons who
may be presumptively eligible for benefits under Medicaid;
(b) Standardized procedures for making preliminary
assessments to determine whether a person may be presumptively
eligible under Medicaid;
(c) Protocols for notifying persons who are determined to be
presumptively eligible for Medicaid of the process to apply for full
benefits under Medicaid; and
(d) Ensuring the accuracy of determinations concerning the
presumptive eligibility of persons for Medicaid.
3. To the extent authorized by the Federal Government, each
certification described in subsection 1 must expire 1 year after the
certification is issued.
4. The Department shall conduct regular audits of all entities
that make determinations concerning the presumptive eligibility of
persons for Medicaid pursuant to this section. Such audits must
verify:
(a) The accuracy of the determinations made by the personnel
of those entities concerning the presumptive eligibility of persons
for Medicaid; and
(b) Compliance with other state and federal requirements
governing Medicaid.
Sec. 51.3. 1. To the extent authorized by federal law and to
the extent that money is available, the Director shall include under
Medicaid a system of value-based payments for care provided by
independent centers for emergency medical care. That system
must be designed to provide higher rates of reimbursement to
independent centers for emergency medical care that:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 52 –
(a) Provide high quality of care to recipients of Medicaid; and
(b) Ensure that recipients of Medicaid receive an appropriate
level of care for the conditions with which the recipients present at
an independent center for emergency medical care.
2. To the extent that money is available to implement the
system of value-based payments described in subsection 1, the
Department shall:
(a) Apply to the Secretary of Health and Human Services for
any waiver of federal law or apply for any amendment of the State
Plan for Medicaid that is necessary for the Department to receive
federal authorization to implement the system of value-based
payments described in subsection 1.
(b) Fully cooperate in good faith with the Federal Government
during the application process to satisfy the requirements of the
Federal Government for obtaining a waiver or amendment
pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. As used in this section, “independent center for emergency
medical care” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.013.
Sec. 51.5. 1. A provider of services under Medicaid shall:
(a) Maintain such documents as are required by regulation of
the Administrator for the verification of claims for the period of
time specified in those regulations; and
(b) Provide the documents maintained pursuant to paragraph
(a) to the Department upon the request of the Department.
2. The Department may audit any documents provided
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1. If the Department is
unable to verify a claim using the documents maintained pursuant
to subsection 1, the Department may deny the claim or, if the
Department has already paid the claim, recover the amount of the
payment from the provider.
Sec. 51.8. 1. If the Department determines that a provider
of services under Medicaid may be prescribing or providing
services in a manner that exceeds the needs of recipients of
Medicaid, is unnecessary or otherwise conflicts with applicable
professional standards or the requirements of the Medicaid
program, the Department shall perform a review of the relevant
claims to evaluate the appropriateness and propriety of the
services for which payment is claimed. If the Department has not
paid the claims, the review must occur before the Department pays
the claims.
2. Upon deciding to conduct a review pursuant to subsection
1, the Department shall:
(a) Notify the provider of services who submitted the claims
subject to the review; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 53 –
(b) Require the provider of services to submit to the
Department within a period of time specified by the Department
any documentation necessary to substantiate the claims.
3. If a provider of services fails to submit the documentation
required by the Department pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 within the time specified pursuant to that paragraph,
the Department may take the actions described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 5 without the opportunity for a hearing pursuant to
NRS 422.306.
4. Not later than 60 days after receiving the documentation
requested pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2, the
Department shall complete a review pursuant to this section and
either:
(a) Pay the claims that were subject to the review or, if the
Department has already paid such a claim, notify the provider of
services who made the claim that the claim has been upheld; or
(b) Take an action described in paragraph (a) of subsection 5
with respect to the claims that were subject to the review.
5. If the Department determines after conducting a review
pursuant to this section that a provider of services has prescribed
or provided services in a manner that exceeds the needs of
recipients of Medicaid, is unnecessary or otherwise conflicts with
applicable professional standards or the requirements of the
Medicaid program, the Department may, after the opportunity for
a hearing pursuant to NRS 422.306:
(a) Deny the affected claims or, if the Department has already
paid an affected claim, recover the amount of the payment from
the provider;
(b) Require the provider to request and receive authorization
for the delivery of services to recipients of Medicaid before
delivering the services; or
(c) Take any other action authorized by this chapter and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
Sec. 52. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 53. As used in sections 53 to 63, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 53.5, 54 and 55 of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 53.5. “Medicaid managed care entity” means:
1. A health maintenance organization or other managed care
organization that enters into a contract with the Department or the
Division pursuant to NRS 422.273 to provide health care to
recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 54 –
2. An administrator, as defined in NRS 683A.025, that
performs any function related to prior authorization or the
payment of claims for the Department or a health maintenance
organization or managed care organization described in
subsection 1 with respect to Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, while acting in its capacity as an
administrator for the Department or the health maintenance
organization or managed care organization; or
3. A utilization review organization, as defined in NRS
695G.085, that conducts utilization reviews for the Department or
a health maintenance organization or managed care organization
described in subsection 1 with respect to Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program, while acting in its capacity
as a utilization review organization for the Department or the
health maintenance organization or managed care organization.
Sec. 54. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 695G.070.
Sec. 55. “Recipient” means a natural person who receives
benefits through Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, as applicable.
Sec. 56. 1. Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a
specific statute, the Department or a Medicaid managed care
entity, with respect to Medicaid and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, shall approve or deny a request for prior
authorization for medical or dental care provided to a recipient or
provide notice of a delay in accordance with section 58 of this act
within:
(a) Two business days after receiving the request; or
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 4, if the
Prior Authorization and Referrals Operating Rules prescribed by
the Committee on Operating Rules for Information Exchange of
the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare, or its successor
organization would allow the Department or Medicaid managed
care entity more than 2 business days to respond to a particular
request for prior authorization after receiving the request, the
period of time prescribed by the Rules.
2. Notwithstanding any period of time prescribed by the Rules
described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the Department or a
Medicaid managed care entity shall respond as required by
subsection 1 to a request for prior authorization within 7 calendar
days after receiving the request.
3. If the Department fails to comply with subsection 1, 2 or 4,
as applicable, with respect to a particular request for prior
authorization, the request shall be deemed approved.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 55 –
4. The Department, in collaboration with the Commissioner
of Insurance, shall review each revision to the Rules described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 to ensure their suitability for this
State. If the Department determines that a revision is not suitable
for this State, the Department shall hold a public hearing within 6
months after the date the Rules were revised to review the
determination. If the Department does not revise its determination,
the Department shall give notice within 30 days after the hearing
that the revisions are not suitable for this State. If the Department
gives such notice, the Department or a Medicaid managed care
entity shall respond as required by subsection 1 to any request for
prior authorization that is submitted to the Department or
Medicaid managed are entity, as applicable, after the date on
which such notice is given within 2 business days after receiving
the request.
5. The Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall
not require prior authorization for emergency services covered by
Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program, including,
where applicable, transportation by ambulance to a hospital or
other medical facility.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall comply with
the provisions of section 107 of this act to the same extent as a
health carrier, as defined in section 98 of this act. The provisions
of this subsection do not apply to:
(a) Any drug that is in a class of drugs that is included on the
list of preferred prescription drugs developed pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 422.4025;
(b) Any goods or services for which prior authorization is
required by the Federal Government; or
(c) Any goods or services for which prior authorization is
required by regulation of the Department pursuant to
subsection 7.
7. The Department may, by regulation, require the holder of
a Gold Card Exemption issued pursuant to section 107 of this act
to obtain prior authorization for goods or services provided to
recipients of Medicaid or benefits under the Children’s Health
Insurance Program if the Department determines that not
requiring prior authorization for such goods or services would
create a risk of fraud or abuse or impair the ability of the
Department to control the cost of those programs. Any such
requirement may only apply to a particular good or service and
must not apply to an entire class of goods or services.
8. The Department and Medicaid managed care entities are
not subject to the regulations adopted by the Commissioner of
-
*SB495_R1*

– 56 –
Insurance pursuant to subsection 8 of section 107 of this act. The
Administrator shall, pursuant to NRS 422.2368, adopt regulations
applicable to the Department and Medicaid managed care entities
that, to the extent practicable, are similar to the regulations
adopted by the Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to subsection
8 of section 107 of this act.
9. In addition to the regulations adopted pursuant to
subsection 8, the Department shall adopt regulations to ensure the
quality of care provided by the holders of Gold Card Exemptions
issued by the Department and Medicaid managed care entities
pursuant to section 107 of this act. Those regulations must utilize
appropriate measurements and ratings of quality of health care,
which may include, without limitation:
(a) The Five-Star Quality Rating System established by the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services or other standards
and metrics adopted by that agency; or
(b) Standards and metrics prescribed by the National
Committee for Quality Assurance, or its successor organization.
10. The Department shall review the status of any holder of a
Gold Card Exemption issued by the Department or a Medicaid
managed care entity pursuant to section 107 of this act that fails to
maintain an average rating for quality in accordance with the
applicable standards adopted pursuant to subsection 9. The
Department may suspend or revoke the Gold Card Exemption if,
after conducting the review, the Department determines that the
holder is not taking sufficient measures to improve the quality of
the care provided by the holder.
11. The Department shall:
(a) Collect any data necessary to implement the provisions of
subsections 9 and 10. Such data must include, without limitation,
data related to the quality of care provided by the holders of Gold
Card Exemptions issued by the Department and Medicaid
managed care entities pursuant to section 107 of this act by age,
race, ethnicity, primary language and disability of the recipient of
the care.
(b) Annually publish on an Internet website maintained by the
Department a summary of the data collected pursuant to
paragraph (a).
12. As used in this section, “emergency services” means
health care services that are provided by a provider of health care
to screen and to stabilize a recipient after the sudden onset of a
medical condition that manifests itself by symptoms of such
sufficient severity that a prudent person would believe that the
absence of immediate medical attention could result in:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 57 –
(a) Serious jeopardy to the health of the recipient;
(b) Serious jeopardy to the health of an unborn child of the
recipient;
(c) Serious impairment of a bodily function of the recipient; or
(d) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part of the
recipient.
Sec. 57. 1. The Department shall implement an electronic
system for receiving and processing requests for prior
authorization for medical or dental care provided to recipients
under Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance Program.
Such a system must:
(a) Allow providers of health care to electronically submit,
track and receive updates concerning requests for prior
authorization; and
(b) Comply with:
(1) The Connectivity Operating Rules, Eligibility and
Benefits Operating Rules and Health Care Claims Operating
Rules prescribed by the Committee on Operating Rules for
Information Exchange of the Council for Affordable Quality
Healthcare, or its successor organization;
(2) The provisions of the Prior Authorization and Referrals
Operating Rules prescribed by the Committee on Operating Rules
for Information Exchange of the Council for Affordable Quality
Healthcare, or its successor organization, which relate to prior
authorization; and
(3) Any federal laws or regulations governing electronic
systems for receiving and processing requests for prior
authorization applicable to Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program.
2. The Department, in collaboration with the Commissioner
of Insurance, shall review each revision to the Rules described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 to ensure their suitability for this
State. If the Department determines that a revision is not suitable
for this State, the Department shall hold a public hearing within 6
months after the date the Rules were revised to review the
determination. If the Department does not revise his or her
determination, the Department shall give notice within 30 days
after the hearing that the revisions are not suitable for this State.
If the Department does not give such notice, the Department shall
comply with the revision not later than 2 years after the date on
which the revision was finalized.
Sec. 58. Upon determining that it is necessary to delay a
response to a request for prior authorization beyond the period
prescribed by subsection 1, 2 or 4, as applicable, of section 56 of
this act, the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall
-
*SB495_R1*

– 58 –
transmit a written notice to the recipient to whom the request
pertains and an electronic notice to the provider of health care
who submitted the request or the person designated by the provider
of health care to manage requests for prior authorization. Such
notice must contain:
1. A specific description of all reasons that the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, is delaying the
response;
2. The steps necessary to resolve the delay; and
3. The anticipated timeline for resolving the delay.
Sec. 59. 1. Upon denying a request for prior authorization,
the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable,
shall transmit to:
(a) The recipient to whom the request pertains a written notice
that contains:
(1) A specific description of all reasons that the Department
or Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, denied the
request;
(2) A description of any documentation that the
Department or Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable,
requested from the recipient or a provider of health care of the
recipient and did not receive or deemed insufficient, if the failure
to receive sufficient documentation contributed to the denial;
(3) A statement that the recipient has the right to appeal the
denial;
(4) Instructions, written in clear language that is
understandable to an ordinary layperson, describing how the
recipient can appeal the denial through the process established
pursuant to subsection 2; and
(5) A description of any documentation that may be
necessary or pertinent to an appeal.
(b) The provider of health care who submitted the request or
the person designated by the provider of health care to manage
requests for prior authorization an electronic notice that includes
all the information required by the Rules described in subsection 1
of section 56 of this act.
2. The Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall
establish a process that allows a recipient to appeal the denial of a
request for prior authorization. The process must allow for the
clear resolution of each appeal within a reasonable time.
Sec. 60. 1. The Department or a Medicaid managed care
entity, with respect to Medicaid and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, shall not revoke a request for prior
authorization that the Department or Medicaid managed care
entity, as applicable, has previously approved or delay or deny
-
*SB495_R1*

– 59 –
payment for the medical or dental care to which such a request
pertains unless the Department or Medicaid managed care entity,
as applicable, determines that:
(a) A recipient or a provider of health care procured the
approval by fraud or material misrepresentation;
(b) The approval was affected by a clerical error; or
(c) The person to which the medical or dental care was
provided was not, on the date on which the care was provided, a
recipient.
2. After approving a request for prior authorization, the
Department or a Medicaid managed care entity shall not assign a
lower level billing code to the medical or dental care to which the
request pertains or otherwise reduce the payment for such care
below the amount indicated in the request for prior authorization
without a clear, documented justification that aligns with
applicable standards of care.
3. If the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity takes
any action described in subsection 1 or 2, the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity shall provide written notice of the
action using the same remittance process that the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, uses to pay claims to
the provider of health care that submitted the request for prior
authorization. Such notice must include, without limitation, a
detailed description of the justification for the action and
documentation supporting that justification.
4. As used in this section, “clerical error” means a
typographical or administrative error or an error in calculation.
The term does not include any mistake relating to clinical
judgment, the medical necessity of care or the appropriateness of a
treatment.
Sec. 61. 1. The Department or a Medicaid managed care
entity, with respect to Medicaid and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program, shall comply with the provisions of 42 U.S.C.
§ 300gg-113, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, to the
same extent as a health insurance issuer, as defined in 42 U.S.C.
§ 300gg-91.
2. Within the first 90 days that a recipient is enrolled in
Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program, as
applicable, the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity
shall honor a request for prior authorization that has been
approved by a health carrier or other entity that previously
provided the recipient with coverage for medical or dental care if:
(a) The approval was issued within the 12 months immediately
preceding the first day of the enrollment of the recipient; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 60 –
(b) The specific medical or dental care included within the
request is not affirmatively excluded under the terms and
conditions of Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance
Program, as applicable.
3. The Department or a Medicaid managed care entity may
undertake an independent review of the care approved by the
previous health carrier of a recipient which is subject to the
requirements of subsection 2 for the purpose of granting its own
approval of the care. The Department or a Medicaid managed
care entity shall not deny approval in violation of subsection 2 as
the result of such a review.
4. If the Department or a Medicaid managed care entity
approves a request for prior authorization, the Department or
Medicaid managed care entity, as applicable, shall not revoke,
limit, condition or restrict the approval due to a subsequent
change in the coverage under Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program or the criteria under which the approval was
initially issued unless the approved services are no longer covered
as a result of the change in coverage.
Sec. 62. 1. On or before March 1 of each year, the
Department shall:
(a) Compile, post on an Internet website maintained by the
Department and submit to the Commissioner of Insurance the
following information for Medicaid and the Children’s Health
Insurance Program:
(1) The specific goods and services for which the
Department requires prior authorization and, for each good or
service:
(I) The number of requests for prior authorization
received by the Department during the immediately preceding
calendar year for the provision of the good or service to recipients;
(II) The number and percentage of the requests
included pursuant to sub-subparagraph (I) that were approved;
and
(III) The number and percentage of the requests
included pursuant to sub-subparagraph (I) that were denied;
(2) The average amounts of time between when the
Department received a request for prior authorization during the
immediately preceding year and when the Department:
(I) Initially responded to the request;
(II) Approved or denied the request; and
(III) Paid the claim to which the request pertains;
(3) The percentage of claims received by the Department
during the immediately preceding year that the Department
-
*SB495_R1*

– 61 –
retroactively denied and detailed written explanations of the
reasons for such denials; and
(4) Explanations of corrective actions that the Department
is taking or intends to take to:
(I) Lower the rates of delays and denials of requests for
prior authorization and payment of claims; and
(II) Correct any failure to comply with the provisions of
sections 52 to 63, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Submit the report compiled pursuant to paragraph (a) to
the Commissioner of Insurance for inclusion on the Internet
website maintained by the Commissioner pursuant to section 106
of this act.
2. The Department shall not include individually identifiable
health information in a report published pursuant to this section.
3. As used in this section, “individually identifiable health
information” means information relating to the provision of
medical or dental care to a recipient:
(a) That specifically identifies the recipient; or
(b) For which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the
information can be used to identify the recipient.
Sec. 63. 1. The Department shall comply with the
requirements of 42 C.F.R. § 447.45(d)(2) and (3).
2. If the Department approves a claim under Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program, the Department shall pay
the claim within 30 days after it is approved. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, if the approved claim is not paid within
that period, the Department shall pay interest on the claim at a
rate of interest equal to the prime rate at the largest bank in
Nevada, as ascertained by the Commissioner of Financial
Institutions, on January 1 or July 1, as the case may be,
immediately preceding the date on which the payment was due,
plus 6 percent. The interest must be calculated from 30 days after
the date on which the claim is approved until the date on which
the claim is paid.
3. If the Department requires additional information to
determine whether to approve or deny a claim under Medicaid or
the Children’s Health Insurance Program, it shall notify the
claimant of its request for the additional information within 20
days after it receives the claim. The Department shall notify the
provider of health care of all the specific reasons for the delay in
approving or denying the claim. The Department shall approve or
deny the claim within 30 days after receiving the additional
information. If the claim is approved, the insurer shall pay the
claim within 30 days after it receives the additional information. If
the approved claim is not paid within that period, the Department
-
*SB495_R1*

– 62 –
shall pay interest on the claim in the manner prescribed in
subsection 2.
4. The Department shall not request a claimant to resubmit
information that the claimant has already provided to the
Department, unless the Department provides a legitimate reason
for the request and the purpose of the request is not to delay the
payment of the claim, harass the claimant or discourage the filing
of claims.
5. The Department shall not pay only part of a claim that has
been approved and is fully payable.
6. If the failure to pay an approved claim within the time
period specified in subsection 2 or 3 is the fault of an entity with
which the Department has contracted to perform functions
relating to the payment of claims under Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program, the Department may
collect from that person reimbursement for the cost of the interest
required by those subsections.
Sec. 64. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 65. NRS 422.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.403 1. The Department shall, by regulation, establish and
manage the use by the Medicaid program of step therapy and prior
authorization for prescription drugs.
2. The Drug Use Review Board shall:
(a) Advise the Department concerning the use by the Medicaid
program of step therapy and prior authorization for prescription
drugs;
(b) Develop step therapy protocols and prior authorization
policies and procedures that comply with the provisions of sections
53 to 63, inclusive, of this act for use by the Medicaid program for
prescription drugs; and
(c) Review and approve, based on clinical evidence and best
clinical practice guidelines and without consideration of the cost of
the prescription drugs being considered, step therapy protocols used
by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
3. The step therapy protocol established pursuant to this section
must not apply to a drug approved by the Food and Drug
Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric condition of a
recipient of Medicaid, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 63 –
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in Medicaid is located 60 miles or more from
the residence of the recipient; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the recipient, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
4. The Department shall not require the Drug Use Review
Board to develop, review or approve prior authorization policies or
procedures necessary for the operation of the list of preferred
prescription drugs developed pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
5. The Department shall accept recommendations from the
Drug Use Review Board as the basis for developing or revising step
therapy protocols and prior authorization policies and procedures
used by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires a
recipient of Medicaid to use a prescription drug or sequence of
prescription drugs other than a drug that a practitioner recommends
for treatment of a psychiatric condition of the recipient before
Medicaid provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 66. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 66.3. Chapter 433 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 66.6 to 67.5, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 66.6. As used in sections 66.6 to 67.5, inclusive, of this
act, unless the context otherwise requires, “Office” means the
Office of Mental Health created by section 67 of this act.
Sec. 67. 1. The Office of Mental Health is hereby created
within the Department.
2. The Governor shall appoint the Executive Director of the
Office. The Executive Director:
(a) Serves at the pleasure of the Governor;
(b) Shall serve as the executive head of the Office; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 64 –
(c) Must have relevant professional experience in the field of
behavioral health. The Governor shall give preference to
candidates who have:
(1) Clinical experience in mental health; or
(2) Designing and administering systems of care, including,
without limitation, community-based care, for persons with
behavioral health needs.
3. The Executive Director must not have any conflicts of
interest in the performance of his or her duties. Such prohibited
conflicts of interest include, without limitation:
(a) A financial interest or other personal interest in any entity
that:
(1) Provides behavioral health services; or
(2) Owns, operates or controls an entity that provides
behavioral health services.
(b) Currently receiving payment from any person or entity
other than the Department for the provision of behavioral health
services.
4. The Office may apply for and accept gifts, grants and
donations from any source for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of sections 66.6 to 67.5, inclusive, of this act.
5. As used in this section, “behavioral health services”
includes, without limitation, treatment or other services for
persons with mental illnesses or persons with substance use
disorders.
Sec. 67.2. The Office shall perform such activities and
functions as may be necessary to:
1. Expand access to behavioral health care, with a focus on
meeting the behavioral health needs of children, addressing
shortages in the mental health care workforce, promoting
economic efficiency and meeting the needs of rural and
underserved areas;
2. Identify best practices in policy regarding mental health
care, including, without limitation, the funding of mental health
care, to reduce the long-term costs of mental health care and
social services to the State and political subdivisions thereof;
3. Coordinate with the Commission on Behavioral Health,
the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy of the
Department, the Division of Child and Family Services of the
Department and the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of
the Department, other state agencies, the regional behavioral
health policy boards created by NRS 433.429, the mental health
consortia established by NRS 433B.333, local governments,
providers of health care, schools, school districts, postsecondary
educational institutions, community organizations and such other
-
*SB495_R1*

– 65 –
persons and entities as necessary to facilitate a unified approach
to the delivery of mental health services and the development of
the mental health care workforce in this State;
4. Regularly assess the effectiveness of mental health services
and programs provided by the State Government and the impact of
such programs on access to quality mental health care in this
State; and
5. Coordinate with the Division of Health Care Financing
and Policy of the Department to support participation in Medicaid
by providers of mental health care by:
(a) Providing training and technical assistance concerning
billing and the submission of claims under Medicaid; and
(b) Making recommendations to the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy for:
(1) Reducing administrative barriers to reimbursement of
providers of mental health care under Medicaid; and
(2) Providing sustainable, competitive rates of
reimbursement for providers of mental health services under
Medicaid within the limits of available money.
Sec. 67.4. The Office shall:
1. Develop, publish and update as necessary a statewide plan
for the provision of mental and behavioral health services to
children in this State.
2. Provide expertise and serve as a resource for matters
relating to mental and behavioral health services for children in
this State.
3. Disseminate information relating to programs,
opportunities and resources to improve mental and behavioral
health care for children in this State.
4. Review the long-term strategic plan, budget requests and
reports submitted to the Executive Director by each mental health
consortium pursuant to NRS 433B.335.
5. Track, review and analyze the policies, programs, reports
or recommendations of the Commission, each regional behavioral
health policy board created by NRS 433.429 and any other agency,
board or commission that relate to the mental or behavioral health
of children.
6. Study and make recommendations to local, state and
federal governmental entities concerning policies that relate to the
mental and behavioral health needs of children in this State with
the goal of improving access to and the delivery of mental and
behavioral health services and resources for children in this State.
7. Develop sustainable partnerships with community-based
organizations and other private sector entities that serve children
with mental and behavioral health needs in this State.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 66 –
8. Collaborate with other persons and entities in this State as
necessary to streamline and integrate mental and behavioral
health services for children in this State.
Sec. 67.5. On or before February 1 of each year, the Office
shall:
1. Compile a report that includes, without limitation:
(a) An assessment of any progress in expanding mental health
services and the capacity of the mental health care workforce in
this State;
(b) An analysis of the state budget and the economic impacts
of mental health programs;
(c) Any recommendations for adjustments to policy regarding
mental health care or funding for mental health programs;
(d) Data on the utilization of mental health services, the
outcomes of mental health programs, the distribution of the
mental health care workforce of this State and the allocation of
funding for mental health programs; and
(e) A report on the progress of the State in implementing the
statewide plan for the provision of mental and behavioral health
services to children in this State adopted pursuant to subsection 1
of section 67.4 of this act, which must include, without limitation,
any recommendations concerning changes to policy or funding
necessary to implement the statewide plan.
2. Submit the report to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(a) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(b) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature.
Sec. 67.6. NRS 433.317 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.317 1. The Commission shall appoint a subcommittee on
the mental health of children to review the findings and
recommendations of each mental health consortium submitted
pursuant to NRS 433B.335 and to [create a] advise the Office of
Mental Health in the creation and updating of the statewide plan
for the provision of mental and behavioral health services to
children [.] pursuant to subsection 1 of section 67.4 of this act.
2. The members of the subcommittee appointed pursuant to
this section serve at the pleasure of the Commission. The members
serve without compensation, except that each member is entitled,
while engaged in the business of the subcommittee, to the per diem
allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally if funding is available for this purpose.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 67 –
Sec. 67.7. NRS 433B.335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
433B.335 1. Each mental health consortium established
pursuant to NRS 433B.333 shall prepare and submit to the Director
of the Department and the Executive Director of the Office of
Mental Health a long-term strategic plan for the provision of mental
health services to children with emotional disturbance in the
jurisdiction of the consortium. A plan submitted pursuant to this
section is valid for 10 years after the date of submission, and each
consortium shall submit a new plan upon its expiration.
2. In preparing the long-term strategic plan pursuant to
subsection 1, each mental health consortium must be guided by the
following principles:
(a) The system of mental health services set forth in the plan
should be centered on children with emotional disturbance and their
families, with the needs and strengths of those children and their
families dictating the types and mix of services provided.
(b) The families of children with emotional disturbance,
including, without limitation, foster parents, should be active
participants in all aspects of planning, selecting and delivering
mental health services at the local level.
(c) The system of mental health services should be community-
based and flexible, with accountability and the focus of the services
at the local level.
(d) The system of mental health services should provide timely
access to a comprehensive array of cost-effective mental health
services.
(e) Children and their families who are in need of mental health
services should be identified as early as possible through screening,
assessment processes, treatment and systems of support.
(f) Comprehensive mental health services should be made
available in the least restrictive but clinically appropriate
environment.
(g) The family of a child with an emotional disturbance should
be eligible to receive mental health services from the system.
(h) Mental health services should be provided to children with
emotional disturbance in a sensitive manner that is responsive to
cultural and gender-based differences and the special needs of the
children.
3. The long-term strategic plan prepared pursuant to subsection
1 must include:
(a) An assessment of the need for mental health services in the
jurisdiction of the consortium;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 68 –
(b) The long-term strategies and goals of the consortium for
providing mental health services to children with emotional
disturbance within the jurisdiction of the consortium;
(c) A description of the types of services to be offered to
children with emotional disturbance within the jurisdiction of the
consortium;
(d) Criteria for eligibility for those services;
(e) A description of the manner in which those services may be
obtained by eligible children;
(f) The manner in which the costs for those services will be
allocated;
(g) The mechanisms to manage the money provided for those
services;
(h) Documentation of the number of children with emotional
disturbance who are not currently being provided services, the costs
to provide services to those children, the obstacles to providing
services to those children and recommendations for removing those
obstacles;
(i) Methods for obtaining additional money and services for
children with emotional disturbance from private and public entities;
and
(j) The manner in which family members of eligible children
and other persons may be involved in the treatment of the children.
4. On or before January 31 of each even-numbered year, each
mental health consortium shall submit to the Director of the
Department , the Executive Director of the Office of Mental Health
and the Commission:
(a) A list of the priorities of services necessary to implement the
long-term strategic plan submitted pursuant to subsection 1 and an
itemized list of the costs to provide those services;
(b) A description of any revisions to the long-term strategic plan
adopted by the consortium during the immediately preceding year;
and
(c) Any request for an allocation for administrative expenses of
the consortium.
5. In preparing the biennial budget request for the Department,
the Director of the Department shall consider the list of priorities
and any request for an allocation submitted pursuant to subsection 4
by each mental health consortium. On or before September 30 of
each even-numbered year, the Director of the Department shall
submit to each mental health consortium a report which includes a
description of:
(a) Each item on the list of priorities of the consortium that was
included in the biennial budget request for the Department;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 69 –
(b) Each item on the list of priorities of the consortium that was
not included in the biennial budget request for the Department and
an explanation for the exclusion; and
(c) Any request for an allocation for administrative expenses of
the consortium that was included in the biennial budget request for
the Department.
6. On or before January 31 of each odd-numbered year, each
consortium shall submit to the Director of the Department , the
Executive Director of the Office of Mental Health and the
Commission:
(a) A report regarding the status of the long-term strategic plan
submitted pursuant to subsection 1, including, without limitation,
the status of the strategies, goals and services included in the plan;
(b) A description of any revisions to the long-term strategic plan
adopted by the consortium during the immediately preceding year;
and
(c) A report of all expenditures made from an account
maintained pursuant to NRS 433B.339, if any.
Sec. 67.8. NRS 433B.337 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
433B.337 1. A mental health consortium established by NRS
433B.333 may:
(a) Participate in activities within the jurisdiction of the
consortium to:
(1) Implement the provisions of the long-term strategic plan
established by the consortium pursuant to NRS 433B.335; and
(2) Improve the provision of mental health services to
children with emotional disturbance and their families, including,
without limitation, advertising the availability of mental health
services and carrying out a demonstration project relating to mental
health services.
(b) Take other action to carry out its duties set forth in this
section and NRS 433B.335 and 433B.339.
2. To the extent practicable, a mental health consortium shall
coordinate with the Department to avoid duplicating or
contradicting the efforts of the Department to provide mental health
services to children with emotional disturbance and their families.
3. A mental health consortium shall collaborate with the
Office of Mental Health as necessary to assist the Office in
carrying out the duties set forth in sections 67.2 and 67.4 of this
act.
Sec. 67.9. NRS 603A.100 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
603A.100 1. The provisions of NRS 603A.010 to 603A.290,
inclusive, do not apply to the maintenance or transmittal of
-
*SB495_R1*

– 70 –
information in accordance with NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto.
2. A data collector who is also an operator, as defined in NRS
603A.330, shall comply with the provisions of NRS 603A.300 to
603A.360, inclusive.
3. Any waiver of the provisions of NRS 603A.010 to
603A.290, inclusive, is contrary to public policy, void and
unenforceable.
Sec. 68. NRS 608.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.1555 Any employer who provides benefits for health care
to his or her employees shall provide the same benefits and pay
providers of health care in the same manner as a policy of insurance
pursuant to chapters 689A and 689B of NRS, including, without
limitation, as required by NRS 687B.409, 687B.723 and 687B.725
[.] and section 109 of this act.
Sec. 69. NRS 608.1555 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.1555 Any employer who provides benefits for health care
to his or her employees shall provide the same benefits and pay
providers of health care in the same manner as a policy of insurance
pursuant to chapters 689A and 689B of NRS, including, without
limitation, as required by paragraph (b) of subsection 2 and
subsections 1 and 3 to 8, inclusive, of NRS 687B.225, NRS
687B.409 [, 687B.723] and 687B.725 [.] and [section] sections 97
to 109 , inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 70. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 71. NRS 613.195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
613.195 1. A noncompetition covenant is void and
unenforceable unless the noncompetition covenant:
(a) Is supported by valuable consideration;
(b) Does not impose any restraint that is greater than is required
for the protection of the employer for whose benefit the restraint is
imposed;
(c) Does not impose any undue hardship on the employee; and
(d) Imposes restrictions that are appropriate in relation to the
valuable consideration supporting the noncompetition covenant.
2. A noncompetition covenant may not restrict, and an
employer may not bring an action to restrict, a former employee of
an employer from providing service to a former customer or client
if:
(a) The former employee did not solicit the former customer or
client;
(b) The customer or client voluntarily chose to leave and seek
services from the former employee; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 71 –
(c) The former employee is otherwise complying with the
limitations in the covenant as to time, geographical area and scope
of activity to be restrained, other than any limitation on providing
services to a former customer or client who seeks the services of the
former employee without any contact instigated by the former
employee.
 Any provision in a noncompetition covenant which violates the
provisions of this subsection is void and unenforceable.
3. A noncompetition covenant may not apply to [an] :
(a) An employee who is paid solely on an hourly wage basis,
exclusive of any tips or gratuities [.] ; or
(b) A patient-facing provider of health care.
4. An employer in this State who negotiates, executes or
attempts to enforce a noncompetition covenant that is void and
unenforceable under this section does not violate the provisions of
NRS 613.200.
5. If the termination of the employment of an employee is the
result of a reduction of force, reorganization or similar restructuring
of the employer, a noncompetition covenant is only enforceable
during the period in which the employer is paying the employee’s
salary, benefits or equivalent compensation, including, without
limitation, severance pay.
6. If an employer brings an action to enforce a noncompetition
covenant or an employee brings an action to challenge a
noncompetition covenant and the court finds the covenant is
supported by valuable consideration but contains limitations as to
time, geographical area or scope of activity to be restrained that are
not reasonable, imposes a greater restraint than is necessary for the
protection of the employer for whose benefit the restraint is imposed
or imposes undue hardship on the employee, the court shall revise
the covenant to the extent necessary and enforce the covenant as
revised. Such revisions must cause the limitations contained in the
covenant as to time, geographical area and scope of activity to be
restrained to be reasonable, to not impose undue hardship on the
employee and to impose a restraint that is not greater than is
necessary for the protection of the employer for whose benefit the
restraint is imposed.
7. If an employer brings an action to enforce a noncompetition
covenant or an employee or contractor brings an action to challenge
a noncompetition covenant and the court finds that the
noncompetition covenant applies to [an employee] a person
described in subsection 3 or that the employer has restricted or
attempted to restrict a former employee in the manner described in
subsection 2, the court shall award the employee or contractor
reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. Nothing in this subsection shall
-
*SB495_R1*

– 72 –
be construed as prohibiting a court from otherwise awarding
attorney’s fees to a prevailing party pursuant to NRS 18.010.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Employer” means every person having control or custody of
any employment, place of employment or any employee.
(b) “Noncompetition covenant” means an agreement between an
employer and employee which, upon termination of the employment
of the employee, prohibits the employee from pursuing a similar
vocation in competition with or becoming employed by a competitor
of the employer.
(c) “Patient-facing provider of health care” means a provider
of health care, as defined in NRS 629.031:
(1) Whose primary duties involve providing clinical care to
patients; and
(2) Who is not employed or contracted to primarily perform
administrative tasks.
Sec. 72. Chapter 629 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A provider of health care who received at least 10 percent
of his or her gross revenue during the immediately preceding
calendar year from providing services to patients covered by
private health insurance shall submit requests for prior
authorization to third parties using the electronic systems
implemented pursuant to sections 57 and 101 of this act, where
applicable.
2. A provider of health care who fails to comply with this
section is guilty of unprofessional conduct and is subject to
disciplinary action by the board, agency or other entity in this
State by which he or she is licensed, certified or regulated.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Private health insurance” does not include health
coverage issued by a health maintenance organization or other
managed care organization to recipients of Medicaid or insurance
under the Children’s Health Insurance Program pursuant to a
contract with the Department of Health and Human Services
entered into pursuant to NRS 422.273.
(b) “Third party”:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
means any insurer or organization providing health coverage or
benefits in accordance with state or federal law.
(2) Does not include:
(I) A plan that is subject to the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974 or any information relating to such
coverage; or
-
*SB495_R1*

– 73 –
(II) Health coverage provided by a local government
agency through a self-insurance reserve fund pursuant to
NRS 287.010.
Sec. 72.3. NRS 629.051 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.051 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
in regulations adopted by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS
652.135 with regard to the records of a medical laboratory and
unless a longer period is provided by federal law, each custodian of
health care records shall retain the health care records of patients as
part of the regularly maintained records of the custodian for 5 years
after their receipt or production. Health care records may be retained
in written form, or by microfilm or any other recognized form of
size reduction, including, without limitation, microfiche, computer
disc, magnetic tape and optical disc, which does not adversely affect
their use for the purposes of NRS 629.061.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4 of NRS
439.589, a high-level provider of health care shall comply with the
requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589 concerning the
maintenance, transmittal and exchange of health records. Health
care records [:
(a) Must, except as otherwise provided in subsections 5 and 6 of
NRS 439.589, be created, maintained, transmitted and exchanged
electronically as required by subsection 4 of NRS 439.589; and
(b) May] may be created, authenticated and stored in a health
information exchange which meets the requirements of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
[2.] 3. A provider of health care shall post, in a conspicuous
place in each location at which the provider of health care performs
health care services, a sign which discloses to patients that their
health care records may be destroyed after the period set forth in
subsection 1.
[3.] 4. When a provider of health care performs health care
services for a patient for the first time, the provider of health care
shall deliver to the patient a written statement which discloses to the
patient that the health care records of the patient may be destroyed
after the period set forth in subsection 1.
[4.] 5. If a provider of health care fails to deliver the written
statement to the patient pursuant to subsection [3,] 4, the provider of
health care shall deliver to the patient the written statement
described in subsection [3] 4 when the provider of health care next
performs health care services for the patient.
[5.] 6. In addition to delivering a written statement pursuant to
subsection [3 or] 4 [,] or 5, a provider of health care may deliver
such a written statement to a patient at any other time.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 74 –
[6.] 7. A written statement delivered to a patient pursuant to
this section may be included with other written information
delivered to the patient by a provider of health care.
[7.] 8. A custodian of health care records shall not destroy the
health care records of a person who is less than 23 years of age on
the date of the proposed destruction of the records. The health care
records of a person who has attained the age of 23 years may be
destroyed in accordance with this section for those records which
have been retained for at least 5 years or for any longer period
provided by federal law.
[8.] 9. If a health care licensing board receives notification
from the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 439.5895 that a high-level provider of health care to which the
health care licensing board has issued a license is not in compliance
with the requirements of subsection 4 or 8, as applicable, of NRS
439.589, the health care licensing board may, after notice and the
opportunity for a hearing in accordance with the provisions of this
title, require corrective action or impose an administrative penalty in
an amount not to exceed the maximum penalty that the health care
licensing board is authorized to impose for other violations. The
health care licensing board shall not suspend or revoke a license for
failure to comply with the requirements of subsection 4 or 8 of
NRS 439.589.
[9. The provisions of this section, except for the provisions of
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 and subsection 8, do not apply to a
pharmacist.]
10. The State Board of Health shall adopt:
(a) Regulations prescribing the form, size, contents and
placement of the signs and written statements required pursuant to
this section; and
(b) Any other regulations necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care licensing board” means:
(1) A board created pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632,
633, 634, 634A, 635, 636, 637, 637B, 639, 640, 640A, 640B, 640C,
641, 641A, 641B, 641C or 641D of NRS.
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(3) The State Board of Health with respect to licenses issued
pursuant to chapter 640D or 640E of NRS.
(b) “High-level provider of health care” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 1 of this act.
(c) “License” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 439.5895.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 75 –
Sec. 72.5. NRS 629.053 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.053 1. The State Board of Health and each board created
pursuant to chapter 630, 630A, 631, 632, 633, 634, 634A, 635, 636,
637, 637B, 640, 640A, 640B, 640C, 641, 641A, 641B, 641C or
641D of NRS shall post on its website on the Internet, if any, a
statement which discloses that:
(a) Pursuant to the provisions of subsection [7] 8 of
NRS 629.051:
(1) The health care records of a person who is less than 23
years of age may not be destroyed; and
(2) The health care records of a person who has attained the
age of 23 years may be destroyed for those records which have been
retained for at least 5 years or for any longer period provided by
federal law; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection [7] 8 of NRS
629.051 and unless a longer period is provided by federal law, the
health care records of a patient who is 23 years of age or older may
be destroyed after 5 years pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 629.051.
2. The State Board of Health shall adopt regulations
prescribing the contents of the statements required pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 72.8. NRS 629.062 is hereby amended to read as follows:
629.062 1. If a person who is authorized to request a copy of
health care records of a patient pursuant to NRS 629.061 requests
that a copy of such records be furnished electronically, the custodian
of health care records must electronically transmit a copy of the
requested records to the person or, if the patient has provided
written authorization for records to be furnished to another person or
entity, to that person or entity. Such records must be furnished in an
electronic format using a method of secure electronic transmission
that complies with applicable federal and state law. If a patient
requests that a copy of his or her health care records be furnished
electronically to the patient or any covered entity, the custodian of
health records shall furnish the copy not later than the end of the
seventh business day after the request is made.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and
subsections 3 and 4, if a custodian of health care records maintains
health care records electronically, any fee to furnish those records
electronically pursuant to subsection 1 must not exceed $40 or the
amount per page prescribed by NRS 629.061, whichever is less. A
custodian of health care records shall not charge a fee to furnish
health care records to a patient or, if the patient has requested a
copy of his or her health care records to be furnished to any
covered entity, to that covered entity.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 76 –
3. If the total amount of the fee chargeable pursuant to
subsection 2 for the furnishing of health care records electronically
is less than $5, a custodian of health care records, other than a
custodian of the health care records of a state or local governmental
entity, may charge a fee of $5 for the furnishing of those health care
records.
4. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
custodian of health care records, other than a custodian of the health
care records of a state or local governmental entity, may charge the
following fees to furnish health care records electronically, in
addition to the total amount of the fee charged pursuant to
subsection 2 or 3:
(a) A fee of $5 for written confirmation that no health care
records were found.
(b) A fee of $5 for furnishing a copy of a certificate of the
custodian of health care records.
(c) A fee of $20 for a copy of a printed film sheet.
(d) A fee of $25 for furnishing a copy of radiologic images in
any form other than a printed film sheet.
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Covered entity” has the meaning ascribed to it in 45
C.F.R. § 160.103.
(b) “Custodian of health care records” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 629.016 and additionally includes a covered entity or
business associate, as those terms are defined in 45 C.F.R. §
160.103.
[(b)] (c) “Health care records” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.021 and additionally includes individually identifiable
health information, as defined in 45 C.F.R. § 160.103.
[(c)] (d) “Secure electronic transmission” means the sending of
information from one computer system to another computer system
in such a manner as to ensure that:
(1) No person other than the intended recipient receives the
information;
(2) The identity and signature of the sender of the
information can be authenticated; and
(3) The information which is received by the intended
recipient is identical to the information that was sent.
Sec. 73. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 74 and 75 of this act.
Sec. 74. 1. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing
a procedure to prioritize the processing of applications for the
initial issuance of a license to practice medicine submitted by an
applicant who intends to practice:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 77 –
(a) Serving geographic areas and populations of this State
where the shortage of providers of health care is most critical, as
identified by the assessment conducted pursuant to section 7 of
this act; or
(b) In a specialty for which the need is most critical, as
identified by the assessment conducted pursuant to section 7 of
this act.
2. In establishing procedures to carry out the regulations
adopted pursuant to this section, the Board shall:
(a) Establish metrics to monitor the processing times of
applications described in subsection 1 to ensure compliance with
the requirements of that subsection; and
(b) In collaboration with the Department of Health and
Human Services, annually update the geographic areas,
populations and specialties for which applications are prioritized
in response to each assessment conducted pursuant to section 7 of
this act.
Sec. 75. 1. The Board shall:
(a) Establish an electronic system to allow an entity that
verifies the credentials of providers of health care pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 50 of this act or
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 109 of this act or a
hospital to access data in the possession of the Board for the
purpose of privileging or credentialing a physician, physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, perfusionist or practitioner of
respiratory care who has authorized the Board to share such data
pursuant to paragraph (b).
(b) Allow an applicant for the issuance of a license to practice
medicine, a physician applying for biennial registration or an
applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license as a physician
assistant, anesthesiologist assistant, perfusionist or practitioner of
respiratory care to indicate whether he or she wishes to allow
electronic access to his or her data pursuant to paragraph (a).
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Credentialing” means verifying the credentials of a
provider of health care for the purpose of determining whether the
provider of health care meets the requirements for participation in
the network of a third party or participation in Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program as a provider of services.
(b) “Network” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.640.
(c) “Privileging” means the process of determining whether to
authorize a provider of health care to provide specific services at a
hospital based on his or her credentials and qualifications.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 78 –
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(e) “Third party”:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
means any insurer or organization providing health coverage or
benefits in accordance with state or federal law.
(2) Does not include:
(I) A plan that is subject to the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974 or any information relating to such
coverage; or
(II) Health coverage provided by a local government
agency through a self-insurance reserve fund pursuant to
NRS 287.010.
Sec. 76. NRS 630.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.130 1. In addition to the other powers and duties
provided in this chapter, the Board shall, in the interest of the public,
judiciously:
(a) Enforce the provisions of this chapter;
(b) Establish by regulation standards for licensure under this
chapter;
(c) Conduct examinations for licensure and establish a system of
scoring for those examinations;
(d) Investigate the character of each applicant for a license and
issue licenses to those applicants who meet the qualifications set by
this chapter and the Board; and
(e) Institute a proceeding in any court to enforce its orders or the
provisions of this chapter.
2. On or before February 15 of each odd-numbered year, the
Board shall submit to the Governor and to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next regular
session of the Legislature a written report compiling:
(a) Disciplinary action taken by the Board during the previous
biennium against any licensee for malpractice or negligence;
(b) Information reported to the Board during the previous
biennium pursuant to NRS 630.3067, 630.3068, subsections 3 and 6
of NRS 630.307 and NRS 690B.250; [and]
(c) Information reported to the Board during the previous
biennium pursuant to NRS 630.30665, including, without limitation,
the number and types of surgeries performed by each holder of a
license to practice medicine and the occurrence of sentinel events
arising from such surgeries, if any [.] ; and
(d) Information relating to the efficiency of the process for
licensing physicians, including, without limitation:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 79 –
(1) The average time during the previous biennium between
when a person applied for a license to practice medicine and when
the license was issued or the application was denied;
(2) The total number of applications for licensure to
practice medicine processed by the Board during the immediately
preceding biennium; and
(3) Recommendations for improvements to the process for
licensing physicians.
 The report must include only aggregate information for statistical
purposes and exclude any identifying information related to a
particular person.
3. The Board may adopt such regulations as are necessary or
desirable to enable it to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
Sec. 76.5. NRS 630.2671 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
630.2671 1. The Board shall [:
(a) Make] make the data request developed by the Director of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for a biennial registration pursuant
to NRS 630.267 or the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter
through a link on the electronic application for a biennial
registration or the renewal of a license . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for a biennial registration pursuant to
NRS 630.267 or the renewal of a license pursuant to this chapter
must, as a condition for such registration or renewal, complete and
electronically submit the data request to the Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for a biennial
registration or the renewal of a license pursuant to subsection [1] 2
is confidential and, except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not
be disclosed to any person or entity.
[3. An applicant for a biennial registration or the renewal of a
license is not required to complete a data request pursuant to
subsection 1 and is not subject to disciplinary action, including,
without limitation, refusal to issue the biennial registration or renew
the license, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 77. Chapter 631 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Board may adopt regulations to establish an
alternative training pathway that an applicant for a license as a
dental hygienist may, subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, complete instead of graduating from a program of
dental hygiene described in paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 631.290.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 80 –
2. Any regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must
require a person receiving training through the alternative
training pathway to:
(a) Complete an educational program comparable to the
educational program required by a program of dental hygiene
described in paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 631.290. Such a
program must include, without limitation:
(1) Two semesters of biology with laboratory components;
(2) Two semesters of chemistry with laboratory
components;
(3) Two semesters of anatomy and physiology;
(4) One semester of microbiology; and
(5) One semester of college-level mathematics.
(b) Complete a program of clinical training under the
supervision of a dentist that is comparable to the clinical training
provided by a program of dental hygiene described in paragraph
(c) of subsection 1 of NRS 631.290 and includes a similar number
of hours of training as such a program; and
(c) Successfully pass a competency examination conducted by
his or her supervising dentist, the written examination required by
subsection 1 of NRS 631.300 and a clinical examination approved
by the Board.
3. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing:
(a) Requirements for the training completed pursuant to
paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 2.
(b) The scope of practice of a dental hygienist who has
completed the alternative training pathway established pursuant to
this section. Those regulations must establish:
(1) Locations where such a dental hygienist may practice
dental hygiene, which must be limited to those identified in
paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 631.310;
and
(2) The manner in which such a dental hygienist must
represent himself or herself to patients.
4. A person who completes the alternative training pathway
established pursuant to this section is only eligible for licensure if
he or she began the alternative training pathway during a
biennium for which the assessment conducted pursuant to section
7 of this act designated dental hygienists as a type of provider of
health care for which there is a shortage in this State.
Sec. 78. NRS 631.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.220 1. Every applicant for a license to practice dental
hygiene, dental therapy, dentistry or expanded function dental
assistance must:
(a) File an application with the Board.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 81 –
(b) Accompany the application with a recent photograph of the
applicant together with the required fee and such other
documentation as the Board may require by regulation.
(c) Submit with the application a complete set of fingerprints
and written permission authorizing the Board to forward the
fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History for submission to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for its report.
(d) If the applicant is required to take an examination pursuant
to NRS 631.240, 631.300, 631.3121, 631.31286 or 631.31287, or
section 77 of this act, submit with the application proof satisfactory
that the applicant passed the examination.
2. In addition to satisfying the requirements of subsection 1, if
an applicant for a license to practice dental hygiene, dental therapy
or dentistry intends to provide services through teledentistry, the
applicant must submit to the Board proof that the applicant has
completed:
(a) At least 2 hours of continuing education concerning
teledentistry; or
(b) A course in teledentistry as part of the requirements for
graduation from an accredited institution.
3. An application must include all information required to
complete the application.
4. The Secretary-Treasurer may, in accordance with regulations
adopted by the Board and if the Secretary-Treasurer determines that
an application is:
(a) Sufficient, advise the Executive Director of the sufficiency
of the application. Upon the advice of the Secretary-Treasurer, the
Executive Director may issue a license to the applicant without
further review by the Board.
(b) Insufficient, reject the application by sending written notice
of the rejection to the applicant.
Sec. 79. NRS 631.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.290 1. Any person is eligible to apply for a license to
practice dental hygiene in this State who:
(a) Is of good moral character;
(b) Is over 18 years of age; and
(c) [Is] Except as otherwise authorized by section 77 of this act,
is a graduate of a program of dental hygiene from an institution
which is accredited by a regional educational accrediting
organization that is recognized by the United States Department of
Education. The program of dental hygiene must:
(1) Be accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation of the American Dental Association or its successor
specialty accrediting organization; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 82 –
(2) Include a curriculum of not less than 2 years of academic
instruction in dental hygiene or its academic equivalent.
2. To determine whether a person has good moral character,
the Board may consider whether his or her license to practice dental
hygiene in another state has been suspended or revoked or whether
he or she is currently involved in any disciplinary action concerning
his or her license in that state.
Sec. 80. NRS 631.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.310 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 631.271
and 631.287 [,] and section 77 of this act, the holder of a license or
renewal certificate to practice dental hygiene may practice dental
hygiene in this State in the following places:
(a) In the office of any licensed dentist.
(b) In a clinic or in clinics in the public schools of this State as
an employee of the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services.
(c) In a clinic or in clinics in a state institution as an employee of
the institution.
(d) In a clinic established by a hospital approved by the Board as
an employee of the hospital where service is rendered only to
patients of the hospital, and upon the authorization of a member of
the dental staff.
(e) In an accredited school of dental hygiene.
(f) In other places if specified in a regulation adopted by the
Board.
2. A dental hygienist may perform only the services which are
authorized by a dentist licensed in the State of Nevada, unless
otherwise provided in a regulation adopted by the Board.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 631.287 or
specifically authorized by a regulation adopted by the Board, a
dental hygienist shall not provide services to a person unless that
person is a patient of the dentist who authorized the performance of
those services.
Sec. 81. NRS 631.3105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.3105 1. A dental hygienist who meets the requirements
prescribed by regulation of the Board pursuant to subsection 4 and is
issued a certificate by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to NRS
639.1374 may prescribe and dispense only:
(a) Topical or systemic prescription drugs, other than controlled
substances, for preventative care;
(b) Fluoride preparations for which a prescription is not
required;
(c) Topical antimicrobial oral rinses; and
(d) Medicament trays or mouthguards.
2. A dental hygienist shall not prescribe or dispense:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 83 –
(a) A controlled substance; or
(b) Any drug or device not listed in subsection 1 or authorized
under the certificate issued pursuant to NRS 639.1374.
3. A dental hygienist may only prescribe and dispense a drug
or device pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) In compliance with any applicable regulations adopted by the
Board; and
(b) In compliance with any applicable law governing the
handling, prescribing and dispensing of the drug or device.
4. The Board shall adopt regulations prescribing the:
(a) Education and training that a dental hygienist must complete
before prescribing and dispensing a drug or device pursuant to
subsection 1; and
(b) Continuing education that a dental hygienist must complete
to be authorized to continue prescribing and dispensing drugs or
devices pursuant to subsection 1.
5. A dental hygienist who has completed the alternative
training pathway established pursuant to section 77 of this act and
has not subsequently graduated from a program of dental hygiene
described in paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 631.290 shall
not prescribe and dispense preventive agents pursuant to this
section.
Sec. 82. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 82.3. NRS 631.332 is hereby amended to read as follows:
631.332 1. The Board shall [:
(a) Make] make the data request developed by the Director of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license
pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license pursuant to
this chapter must, as a condition for such renewal, complete and
electronically submit the data request to the Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 82.6. NRS 632.3423 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
632.3423 1. The Board shall [:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 84 –
(a) Make] make the data request developed by the Director of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license or
certificate pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic
application for the renewal of a license or certificate . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license or
certificate pursuant to this chapter must, as a condition for such
renewal, complete and electronically submit the data request to the
Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license or certificate pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is
confidential and, except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not
be disclosed to any person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certificate is not
required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is
not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certificate, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 83. Chapter 633 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 84 and 85 of this act.
Sec. 84. 1. The Board shall adopt regulations establishing
a procedure to prioritize the processing of applications for the
initial issuance of a license to practice osteopathic medicine
submitted by an applicant who intends to practice:
(a) Serving geographic areas and populations of this State
where the shortage of providers of health care is most critical, as
identified by the assessment conducted pursuant to section 7 of
this act; or
(b) In a specialty for which the need is most critical, as
identified by the assessment conducted pursuant to section 7 of
this act.
2. In establishing procedures to carry out the regulations
adopted pursuant to this section, the Board shall:
(a) Establish metrics to monitor the processing times of
applications described in subsection 1 to ensure compliance with
the requirements of that subsection; and
(b) In collaboration with the Department of Health and
Human Services, annually update the geographic areas,
populations and specialties for which applications are prioritized
in response to each assessment conducted pursuant to section 7 of
this act.
Sec. 85. 1. The Board shall:
(a) Establish an electronic system to allow an entity that
verifies the credentials of providers of health care pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 50 of this act or
-
*SB495_R1*

– 85 –
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 109 of this act, as
applicable, or a hospital to access data in the possession of the
Board for the purpose of privileging or credentialing an
osteopathic physician, physician assistant or anesthesiologist
assistant who has authorized the Board to share such data
pursuant to paragraph (b).
(b) Allow an applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license
as an osteopathic physician, physician assistant or anesthesiologist
assistant to indicate whether he or she wishes to allow electronic
access to his or her data pursuant to paragraph (a).
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Credentialing” means verifying the credentials of a
provider of health care for the purpose of determining whether the
provider of health care meets the requirements for participation in
the network of a third party or participation in Medicaid or the
Children’s Health Insurance Program as a provider of services.
(b) “Network” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 687B.640.
(c) “Privileging” means the process of determining whether to
authorize a provider of health care to provide specific services at a
hospital based on his or her credentials and qualifications.
(d) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(e) “Third party”:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
means any insurer or organization providing health coverage or
benefits in accordance with state or federal law.
(2) Does not include:
(I) A plan that is subject to the Employee Retirement
Income Security Act of 1974 or any information relating to such
coverage; or
(II) Health coverage provided by a local government
agency through a self-insurance reserve fund pursuant to
NRS 287.010.
Sec. 86. NRS 633.286 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.286 1. On or before February 15 of each odd-numbered
year, the Board shall submit to the Governor and to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the next regular
session of the Legislature a written report compiling:
(a) Disciplinary action taken by the Board during the previous
biennium against osteopathic physicians, physician assistants and
anesthesiologist assistants for malpractice or negligence;
(b) Information reported to the Board during the previous
biennium pursuant to NRS 633.526, 633.527, subsections 3 and 6 of
NRS 633.533 and NRS 690B.250; [and]
-
*SB495_R1*

– 86 –
(c) Information reported to the Board during the previous
biennium pursuant to NRS 633.524, including, without limitation,
the number and types of surgeries performed by each holder of a
license to practice osteopathic medicine and the occurrence of
sentinel events arising from such surgeries, if any [.] ; and
(d) Information relating to the efficiency of the process for
licensing osteopathic physicians, including, without limitation:
(1) The average time during the previous biennium between
when a person applied for a license to practice osteopathic
medicine and when the license was issued or the application was
denied;
(2) The total number of applications for licensure to
practice osteopathic medicine processed by the Board during the
immediately preceding biennium; and
(3) Recommendations for improvements to the process for
licensing physicians.
2. The report must include only aggregate information for
statistical purposes and exclude any identifying information related
to a particular person.
Sec. 86.2. NRS 633.4716 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
633.4716 1. The Board shall [:
(a) Make] make the data request developed by the Director of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license
pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license pursuant to
this chapter must, as a condition for such renewal, complete and
electronically submit the data request to the Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 86.4. NRS 635.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
635.111 1. The Board [may:
(a) Make] shall make the data request developed by the Director
of the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license
-
*SB495_R1*

– 87 –
pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license pursuant to
this chapter must, as a condition for such renewal, complete and
electronically submit the data request to the Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 86.6. NRS 636.262 is hereby amended to read as follows:
636.262 1. The Board [may:
(a) Make] shall make the data request developed by the Director
of the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license
pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license pursuant to
this chapter must, as a condition for such renewal, complete and
electronically submit the data request to the Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 86.8. NRS 637.145 is hereby amended to read as follows:
637.145 1. The Board [may:
(a) Make] shall make the data request developed by the Director
of the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license
pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license pursuant to
this chapter must, as a condition for such renewal, complete and
electronically submit the data request to the Director.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 88 –
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 87. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 88. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 89. Chapter 641 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Board shall, to encourage psychologists to receive
training in the mental health needs of patients in rural areas:
(a) Make available to licensees information concerning
continuing education on the mental health needs of such patients
provided by the Committee on Rural Health of the American
Psychological Association; and
(b) Accept any such continuing education completed by a
licensee for credit toward the continuing education required by
paragraph (b) of subsection 4 of NRS 641.220.
2. The Board shall establish a program to recognize
psychologists, including, without limitation and to the extent
practicable, psychologists who practice or provide services through
telehealth in this State pursuant to the Psychology
Interjurisdictional Compact enacted in NRS 641.227, who provide
at least 200 hours of services through telehealth to patients in
rural areas of this State. The program must provide for a
psychologist who meets that requirement to:
(a) Receive a certificate of distinction; and
(b) With the consent of the psychologist, be recognized on an
Internet website maintained by the Board as a “Committed Rural
Service Provider.”
3. The Board may:
(a) Adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the provisions
of this section.
(b) Collect any information from holders of licenses and
certificates issued by the Board necessary to carry out the
provisions of this section.
4. On or before October 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Board shall:
(a) Compile a report concerning the implementation of and
outcomes resulting from the provisions of this section, including,
without limitation and to the extent that such information is
available:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 89 –
(1) Participation in the continuing education described in
subsection 1; and
(2) The number of psychologists recognized under the
program established pursuant to subsection 2 and the estimated
number of hours of services provided through telehealth to
patients in rural areas of this State by such psychologists during
the immediately preceding calendar year; and
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Health and Human Services.
5. As used in this section, “telehealth” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 629.515.
Sec. 89.2. NRS 641.2215 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641.2215 1. The Board shall [:
(a) Make] make the data request developed by the Director of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license or
registration pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic
application for the renewal of a license or registration . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license or
registration pursuant to this chapter must, as a condition for such
renewal, complete and electronically submit the data request to the
Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license or registration pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is
confidential and, except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not
be disclosed to any person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or registration is
not required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and
is not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or registration, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 89.4. NRS 641A.217 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641A.217 1. The Board shall [:
(a) Make] make the data request developed by the Director of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license
pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license pursuant to
this chapter must, as a condition for such renewal, complete and
electronically submit the data request to the Director.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 90 –
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 89.6. NRS 641B.281 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641B.281 1. The Board shall [:
(a) Make] make the data request developed by the Director of
the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license
pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic application
for the renewal of a license . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license pursuant to
this chapter must, as a condition for such renewal, complete and
electronically submit the data request to the Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is confidential and,
except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not be disclosed to any
person or entity.
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license is not required to
complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is not subject
to disciplinary action, including, without limitation, refusal to renew
the license, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 89.8. NRS 641C.455 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
641C.455 1. The Board [may:
(a) Make] shall make the data request developed by the Director
of the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal of a license or
certificate pursuant to this chapter through a link on the electronic
application for the renewal of a license or certificate . [; and
(b) Request each]
2. Each applicant [to] for the renewal of a license or
certificate pursuant to this chapter must, as a condition for such
renewal, complete and electronically submit the data request to the
Director.
[2.] 3. The information provided by an applicant for the
renewal of a license or certificate pursuant to subsection [1] 2 is
confidential and, except as required by subsection [1,] 2, must not
be disclosed to any person or entity.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 91 –
[3. An applicant for the renewal of a license or certificate is not
required to complete a data request pursuant to subsection 1 and is
not subject to disciplinary action, including, without limitation,
refusal to renew the license or certificate, for failure to do so.]
Sec. 89.9. Chapter 641D of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Board shall make the data request developed by the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to NRS 439A.116 available to applicants for the renewal
of a license or registration pursuant to this chapter through a link
on the electronic application for the renewal of a license or
certificate.
2. Each applicant for the renewal of a license or registration
pursuant to this chapter must, as a condition for such renewal,
complete and electronically submit the data request to the
Director.
3. The information provided by an applicant for the renewal
of a license or registration pursuant to subsection 2 is confidential
and, except as required by subsection 2, must not be disclosed to
any person or entity.
Sec. 90. NRS 654.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
654.190 1. The Board may, after notice and an opportunity
for a hearing as required by law, impose an administrative fine of
not more than $10,000 for each violation on, recover reasonable
investigative fees and costs incurred from, suspend, revoke, deny
the issuance or renewal of or place conditions on the license of, and
place on probation or impose any combination of the foregoing on
any licensee who:
(a) Is convicted of a felony relating to the practice of
administering a facility for skilled nursing or facility for
intermediate care or residential facility for groups or of any offense
involving moral turpitude.
(b) Has obtained his or her license by the use of fraud or deceit.
(c) Violates any of the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Aids or abets any person in the violation of any of the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and sections 20,
21 and 22 of this act, or 449A.100 to 449A.124, inclusive, and
449A.270 to 449A.286, inclusive, as those provisions pertain to a
facility for skilled nursing, facility for intermediate care or
residential facility for groups.
(e) Violates any regulation of the Board prescribing additional
standards of conduct for licensees, including, without limitation, a
code of ethics.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 92 –
(f) Engages in conduct that violates the trust of a patient or
resident or exploits the relationship between the licensee and the
patient or resident for the financial or other gain of the licensee.
2. If a licensee requests a hearing pursuant to subsection 1, the
Board shall give the licensee written notice of a hearing pursuant to
NRS 233B.121 and 241.0333. A licensee may waive, in writing, his
or her right to attend the hearing.
3. The Board may compel the attendance of witnesses or the
production of documents or objects by subpoena. The Board may
adopt regulations that set forth a procedure pursuant to which the
Chair of the Board may issue subpoenas on behalf of the Board.
Any person who is subpoenaed pursuant to this subsection may
request the Board to modify the terms of the subpoena or grant
additional time for compliance.
4. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact and
conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
5. The expiration of a license by operation of law or by order
or decision of the Board or a court, or the voluntary surrender of a
license, does not deprive the Board of jurisdiction to proceed with
any investigation of, or action or disciplinary proceeding against, the
licensee or to render a decision suspending or revoking the license.
Sec. 91. Chapter 680A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
The Commissioner may not issue a certificate of authority to
an insurer that will provide health benefits if the insurer does not
meet the requirements established by the regulations adopted
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 108 of this act.
Sec. 92. NRS 680A.095 is hereby amended to read as follows:
680A.095 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
an insurer which is not authorized to transact insurance in this State
may not transact reinsurance with a domestic insurer in this State,
by mail or otherwise, unless the insurer holds a certificate of
authority as a reinsurer in accordance with the provisions of NRS
680A.010 to 680A.150, inclusive, and section 91 of this act,
680A.160 to 680A.280, inclusive, 680A.320 and 680A.330.
2. To qualify for authority only to transact reinsurance, an
insurer must meet the same requirements for capital and surplus as
are imposed on an insurer which is authorized to transact insurance
in this State.
3. This section does not apply to the joint reinsurance of title
insurance risks or to reciprocal insurance authorized pursuant to
chapter 694B of NRS.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 93 –
Sec. 93. NRS 683A.08524 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.08524 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2
or 3, the Commissioner shall issue a certificate of registration as an
administrator to an applicant who:
(a) Submits an application on a form prescribed by the
Commissioner;
(b) Has complied with the provisions of NRS 683A.08522; and
(c) Pays the fee for the issuance of a certificate of registration
prescribed in NRS 680B.010 and, in addition to any other fee or
charge, all applicable fees required pursuant to NRS 680C.110.
2. The Commissioner may refuse to issue a certificate of
registration as an administrator to an applicant if the Commissioner
determines that the applicant or any person who has completed an
affidavit pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 683A.08522:
(a) Is not competent to act as an administrator;
(b) Is not trustworthy or financially responsible;
(c) Does not have a good personal or business reputation;
(d) Has had a license or certificate to transact insurance denied
for cause, suspended or revoked in this state or any other state;
(e) Has failed to comply with any provision of this chapter;
(f) Does not meet the requirements of the regulations adopted
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 108 of this act; or
[(f)] (g) Is financially unsound.
3. If an applicant seeks final approval by the Division of
Industrial Relations of the Department of Business and Industry in
accordance with regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 8 of
NRS 616A.400, the Commissioner shall submit to the Division the
information supplied by the applicant pursuant to subsection 1.
Unless the Division provides final approval for the applicant to the
Commissioner, the Commissioner shall not issue a certificate of
registration as an administrator to the applicant.
Sec. 94. NRS 683A.3715 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
683A.3715 1. An independent review organization must be
approved by the Commissioner to be eligible to be assigned to
conduct external reviews.
2. In order to be eligible for approval or reapproval by the
Commissioner to conduct external reviews, an independent review
organization:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, must be
accredited by a nationally recognized private accrediting entity
which the Commissioner has determined has standards for the
accreditation of independent review organizations that are
-
*SB495_R1*

– 94 –
equivalent to or exceed the minimum qualifications for independent
review organizations established under NRS 683A.372;
(b) Must meet the requirements of the regulations adopted
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 108 of this act; and
[(b)] (c) Must submit an application in accordance with
subsection 4.
3. The Commissioner shall develop an application form for the
initial approval and reapproval of an independent review
organization to conduct external reviews.
4. An independent review organization wishing to be approved
or reapproved to conduct external reviews must submit the
application form and include with the form all documentation and
information necessary for the Commissioner to determine if the
independent review organization satisfies the minimum
qualifications established under NRS 683A.372 [.] and the
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of section 108 of this
act.
5. The Commissioner may approve an independent review
organization that is not accredited by a nationally recognized private
accrediting entity if there are no acceptable nationally recognized
private accrediting entities providing accreditation of independent
review organizations.
6. The Commissioner may charge any applicable fee which an
independent review organization must submit to the Commissioner
with its application for initial approval or reapproval.
7. An approval or reapproval is effective for 2 years unless the
Commissioner determines before its expiration that the independent
review organization does not satisfy the minimum qualifications
established under NRS 683A.372.
8. Whenever the Commissioner determines that an independent
review organization has lost its accreditation or no longer satisfies
the minimum requirements established under NRS 683A.372, the
Commissioner shall terminate the approval of the independent
review organization and remove the independent review
organization from the list of independent review organizations
approved to conduct external reviews that is maintained by the
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 9.
9. The Commissioner shall maintain and periodically update a
list of approved independent review organizations.
10. The Commissioner may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
11. As used in this section, “independent review organization”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 695G.026.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 95 –
Sec. 95. NRS 683A.378 is hereby amended to read as follows:
683A.378 1. A person shall not conduct utilization review
unless the person is:
(a) Registered with the Commissioner as an agent who performs
utilization review and has a medical director who is a physician or,
in the case of an agent who reviews dental services, a dentist,
licensed in any state; or
(b) Employed by a registered agent who performs utilization
review.
2. A person may apply for registration by filing with the
Commissioner the fee specified in NRS 680B.010 and, in addition
to any other fee or charge, all applicable fees required pursuant to
NRS 680C.110 and the following information on a form provided
by the Commissioner:
(a) The applicant’s name, address, telephone number, valid
electronic mail address and normal business hours;
(b) The name and telephone number of a person the
Commissioner may contact for information concerning the
applicant;
(c) The name of the medical director of the applicant and the
state in which he or she is licensed to practice medicine or dentistry;
[and]
(d) A summary of the plan for utilization review, including
procedures for appealing determinations made through utilization
review [.] ; and
(e) Any additional information required by the Commissioner
to ensure that the applicant will meet the requirements of the
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of section 108 of this
act.
3. An agent who performs utilization review shall file with the
Commissioner any material changes in the information provided
pursuant to subsection 1 within 30 days after the change occurs.
4. The Commissioner shall not evaluate the plan submitted
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 2. The Commissioner shall
make the plan available upon request and shall charge a reasonable
fee for providing a copy of the plan.
5. The Commissioner may not approve an application for
registration as an agent who performs utilization review if the
applicant does not meet the requirements of the regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of section 108 of this act.
6. Registration pursuant to this section must be renewed on or
before March 1 of each year by providing the information specified
in subsection 2 and paying the renewal fee specified in NRS
680B.010 and, in addition to any other fee or charge, all applicable
fees required pursuant to NRS 680C.110.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 96 –
Sec. 95.5. NRS 686A.315 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
686A.315 1. If a hospital or independent center for
emergency medical care submits to an insurer the form prescribed
by the Director of the Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to NRS 449.485, that form must contain or be
accompanied by a statement that reads substantially as follows:

Any person who misrepresents or falsifies essential
information requested on this form may, upon conviction, be
subject to a fine and imprisonment under state or federal law,
or both.

2. If a person who is licensed to practice one of the health
professions regulated by title 54 of NRS submits to an insurer the
form commonly referred to as the “HCFA-1500” for a patient who
is not covered by any governmental program which offers insurance
coverage for health care, the form must be accompanied by a
statement that reads substantially as follows:

Any person who knowingly files a statement of claim
containing any misrepresentation or any false, incomplete or
misleading information may be guilty of a criminal act
punishable under state or federal law, or both, and may be
subject to civil penalties.

3. The failure to provide any of the statements required by this
section is not a defense in a prosecution for insurance fraud pursuant
to NRS 686A.291.
Sec. 96. Chapter 687B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 97 to 109, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 97. As used in sections 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 98, 99 and 100 of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 98. “Health carrier” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 695G.024, and includes, without limitation:
1. An administrator, as defined in NRS 683A.025, that
performs any function related to prior authorization for medical
care or the payment of claims under a policy or contract of health
insurance, except for health coverage provided by a local
government agency through a self-insurance reserve fund
pursuant to NRS 287.010; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 97 –
2. A utilization review organization, as defined in NRS
695G.085, except when performing utilization reviews related to
health coverage provided by a local government agency through a
self-insurance reserve fund pursuant to NRS 287.010.
Sec. 99. “Insured” means a policyholder, subscriber,
enrollee or other person covered by a health carrier.
Sec. 100. “Provider of health care” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 695G.070.
Sec. 101. 1. Each health carrier in this State shall
implement an electronic system for receiving and processing
requests for prior authorization. Such a system must:
(a) Allow providers of health care to electronically submit,
track and receive updates concerning requests for prior
authorization; and
(b) Comply with:
(1) The Connectivity Rules, Eligibility and Benefits
Operating Rules and Health Care Claims Operating Rules
prescribed by the Committee on Operating Rules for Information
Exchange of the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare, or its
successor organization;
(2) The provisions of the Prior Authorization and Referrals
Operating Rules prescribed by the Committee on Operating Rules
for Information Exchange of the Council for Affordable Quality
Healthcare, or its successor organization, which relate to prior
authorization; and
(3) Where applicable, any federal laws or regulations
governing electronic systems for receiving and processing requests
for prior authorization applicable to Medicare Advantage plans
and health care plans to provide health care services to recipients
of Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health
Insurance Program.
2. The Commissioner, in collaboration with the Department
of Health and Human Services, shall review each revision to the
Rules described in subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 to ensure their suitability for this State. If the
Commissioner determines that a revision is not suitable for this
State, the Commissioner shall hold a public hearing within 6
months after the date the Rules were revised to review his or her
determination. If the Commissioner does not revise his or her
determination, the Commissioner shall give notice within 30 days
after the hearing that the revisions are not suitable for this State.
3. If the Commissioner does not give notice pursuant to
subsection 2 that a revision to the Rules described in
subparagraphs (1) and (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1 are not
suitable for this State within the time period prescribed in
-
*SB495_R1*

– 98 –
subsection 2, each system implemented by a health carrier
pursuant to subsection 1 must comply with the revision not later
than 2 years after the date on which the revision was finalized.
4. The Commissioner shall annually publish a report on an
Internet website maintained by the Commissioner concerning the
compliance of health carriers in this State with the requirements
of this section.
5. As used in this section, “Medicare Advantage plan” means
a plan of coverage for health benefits under Medicare Part C, as
described in 42 U.S.C. § 1395w-28(b)(1), and includes:
(a) Coordinated care plans that provide health care services,
including, without limitation:
(1) Health maintenance organization plans, with or without
a point-of-service provider;
(2) Plans offered by provider-sponsored organizations; and
(3) Preferred provider organization plans;
(b) Medical savings account plans that are coupled with a
contribution into Medicare Advantage medical savings accounts;
and
(c) Medicare Advantage private fee-for-service plans.
Sec. 101.3. The provisions of NRS 687B.225 and sections
101.6 to 105, inclusive, of this act, do not apply to:
1. A health maintenance organization or other managed care
organization that enters into a contract with the Department of
Health and Human Services or the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy of the Department pursuant to NRS 422.273
to provide health care services to recipients of Medicaid under the
State Plan for Medicaid or insurance under the Children’s Health
Insurance Program to the extent that the organization is providing
such services.
2. An administrator or utilization review organization that
performs any function related to prior authorization for an entity
described in subsection 1, while the administrator or utilization
review organization, as applicable, is performing such functions.
Sec. 101.6. 1. If a health carrier utilizes an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool to process requests
for prior authorization, the health carrier shall make available, in
a place that is readily accessible and conspicuous to insureds and
the public:
(a) A statement that the health carrier utilizes an artificial
intelligence system or automated decision tool to process requests
for prior authorization;
(b) A general description of how the artificial intelligence
system or automated decision tool works; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 99 –
(c) A description of the specific types of information or data
utilized by the artificial intelligence system or automated decision
tool to generate an outcome.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Artificial intelligence system” means a machine-based
system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make
predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or
virtual environments.
(b) “Automated decision tool” means an automated or
computerized system that is specifically developed or modified to
make, or be a controlling factor in making, consequential
decisions.
Sec. 102. Upon determining that it is necessary to delay
approving or denying a request for prior authorization beyond the
period prescribed by paragraph (b) of subsection 2 or subsection 3
or 4, as applicable, of NRS 687B.225, a health carrier shall
transmit a written notice to the insured to whom the request
pertains and an electronic notice to the provider of health care
who submitted the request or the person designated by the provider
of health care to manage requests for prior authorization. Such
notice must contain:
1. A specific description of all reasons that the health carrier
is delaying the response;
2. The steps necessary to resolve the delay; and
3. The anticipated timeline for resolving the delay.
Sec. 103. 1. Upon denying a request for prior
authorization, a health carrier shall transmit to:
(a) The insured to whom the request pertains a written notice
that contains:
(1) A specific description of all reasons that the health
carrier denied the request;
(2) A description of any documentation that the health
carrier requested from the insured or a provider of health care of
the insured and did not receive or deemed insufficient, if the
failure to receive sufficient documentation contributed to the
denial;
(3) A statement that the insured has the right to appeal the
denial;
(4) Instructions, written in clear language that is
understandable to an ordinary layperson, describing how the
insured can appeal the denial through the process established
pursuant to subsection 2; and
(5) A description of any documentation that may be
necessary or pertinent to an appeal.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 100 –
(b) The provider of health care who submitted the request or
the person designated by the provider of health care to manage
requests for prior authorization an electronic notice that includes
all the information required by the Rules described in paragraph
(b) of subsection 2 of NRS 687B.225.
2. A health carrier shall establish a process that allows an
insured to appeal the denial of a request for prior authorization.
The process must allow for the clear resolution of each appeal
within a reasonable time.
Sec. 104. 1. A health carrier shall not revoke a request for
prior authorization that the health carrier has previously approved
or delay or deny payment for the medical care to which such a
request pertains unless the health carrier determines that:
(a) An insured or a provider of health care procured the
approval by fraud or material misrepresentation;
(b) The approval was affected by a clerical error; or
(c) The person to which the medical care was provided was
not, on the date on which the care was provided, an insured of the
health carrier.
2. After a health carrier approves a request for prior
authorization, the health carrier shall not assign a lower level
billing code to the medical care to which the request pertains or
otherwise reduce the payment for such care below the amount
indicated in the request for prior authorization without a clear,
documented justification that aligns with applicable standards of
care.
3. A health carrier that takes any action described in
subsection 1 or 2 shall provide written notice of the action using
the same remittance process that the health carrier uses to pay
claims to the provider of health care that submitted the request for
prior authorization. Such notice must include, without limitation,
a detailed description of the justification for the action and
documentation supporting that justification.
4. As used in this section, “clerical error” means a
typographical or administrative error or an error in calculation.
The term does not include any mistake relating to clinical
judgment, the medical necessity of care or the appropriateness of a
treatment.
Sec. 105. 1. A health carrier shall comply with the
provisions of 26 U.S.C. § 9818 and 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-113, and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. Within the first 90 days of the coverage period for an
insured, a health carrier shall honor a request for prior
authorization that has been approved by a health carrier or other
entity that previously provided the insured with coverage for
-
*SB495_R1*

– 101 –
medical care if the specific medical care included within the
request is not affirmatively excluded under the terms and
conditions of the contract or policy of insurance issued by the
health carrier.
3. The health carrier may, within the 90-day period
established by subsection 2, undertake an independent review of
the medical care that was approved by the health carrier or other
entity that previously provided the insured with coverage. The
health carrier shall not deny approval in violation of subsection 2
as the result of such a review.
4. A change in the health carrier’s procedure for obtaining
prior authorization or a new exclusion or limitation of coverage
adopted by a health carrier may not take effect until the next
coverage period with respect to:
(a) An insured for whom the health carrier has, within the
current coverage period, approved a request for prior
authorization; and
(b) The medical care that is identical to the care for which the
health carrier had previously approved a request for prior
authorization within the current coverage period.
5. If an insured for whom a request for prior authorization
has been approved by a health carrier obtains coverage under a
different policy or contract of health insurance issued by the same
health carrier, the health carrier shall honor the approval to the
same extent as if the insured were still covered under the policy or
contract of health insurance under which the insured was covered
when the health carrier approved the request.
6. As used in this section, “coverage period” means the
current term of a contract or policy of insurance issued by a
health carrier.
Sec. 106. 1. Each health carrier shall annually compile
and transmit to the Commissioner in the form prescribed by the
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 6 a report containing the
following information:
(a) The specific goods and services for which the health
carrier requires prior authorization and, for each good or service:
(1) The number of requests for prior authorization received
by the health carrier during the immediately preceding calendar
year for the provision of the good or service to insureds in this
State;
(2) The number and percentage of the requests included
pursuant to subparagraph (1) that were approved; and
(3) The number and percentage of the requests included
pursuant to subparagraph (1) that were denied;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 102 –
(b) The average amounts of time between when the health
carrier received a request for prior authorization during the
immediately preceding calendar year and when the health carrier:
(1) Initially responded to the request;
(2) Approved or denied the request; and
(3) Paid the claim to which the request pertains;
(c) The percentage of claims received by the health carrier
during the immediately preceding calendar year that the health
carrier retroactively denied and detailed written explanations of
the reasons for such denials;
(d) Explanations of corrective actions that the health carrier is
taking or intends to take to:
(1) Lower the rates of delays and denials of requests for
prior authorization and payment of claims; and
(2) Correct any failure to comply with the provisions of
NRS 687B.225 and sections 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act; and
(e) Such additional information as the Commissioner may
prescribe by regulation.
2. A health carrier shall not include individually identifiable
health information in a report published pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The Commissioner shall aggregate and post on a
centralized, publicly accessible Internet website maintained by the
Commissioner the information submitted to the Commissioner
pursuant to subsection 1 and section 62 of this act. The Internet
website must allow a user to:
(a) View the information submitted pursuant to:
(1) Subsection 1 by each health carrier that does business
in this State; and
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to section 62 of this act.
(b) Compare the information described in paragraph (a) to
performance benchmarks established by the Commissioner.
4. The Commissioner shall annually:
(a) Compile a report:
(1) Summarizing the information submitted to the
Commissioner pursuant to subsection 1 and section 62 of this act;
(2) Describing trends and challenges relating to compliance
with the provisions of NRS 687B.225 and sections 97 to 108,
inclusive, of this act; and
(3) Making recommendations to address the challenges
described in subparagraph (2) and improve the administration of
health insurance in this State; and
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
-
*SB495_R1*

– 103 –
on Health and Human Services and the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Commerce and Labor.
5. The Commissioner may:
(a) Audit the accuracy of reports submitted by health carriers
pursuant to this section; and
(b) Require independent audits for health carriers that have
repeatedly failed to comply with the requirements of this section or
submitted reports that the Commissioner has reason to believe are
inaccurate.
6. The Commissioner shall adopt regulations to carry out the
requirements of this section, including, without limitation,
regulations establishing:
(a) A standardized form for submitting a report pursuant to
subsection 1;
(b) The dates on which:
(1) Health carriers must submit the reports required by
subsection 1; and
(2) The Commissioner will submit the report required by
subsection 4; and
(c) Procedures for conducting audits pursuant to subsection 5.
7. As used in this section, “individually identifiable health
information” means information relating to the provision of
medical care to an insured:
(a) That specifically identifies the insured; or
(b) For which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the
information can be used to identify the insured.
Sec. 107. 1. The Gold Card Exemption Program is hereby
established to exempt providers of health care who receive Gold
Card Exemptions pursuant to subsection 2 from requirements
imposed by health carriers to obtain prior authorization for
specific goods and services set forth in the regulations adopted
pursuant to subsection 8.
2. A health carrier shall issue a Gold Card Exemption to a
provider of health care who participates in the network of the
health carrier if:
(a) Within the immediately preceding 24 months, the health
carrier approved 95 percent or more of the requests for prior
authorization submitted by the provider of health care for a
specific good or service which is eligible for a Gold Card
Exemption under the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection
8; and
(b) The provider of health care meets any other requirements
established by the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 8.
3. A health carrier shall:
-
*SB495_R1*

– 104 –
(a) Annually review the continued eligibility of a provider of
health care who has been granted a Gold Card Exemption
pursuant to this section for that Gold Card Exemption; and
(b) If the health carrier determines through a review
conducted pursuant to paragraph (a) that a provider of health care
who holds a Gold Card Exemption no longer meets the
requirements of subsection 2:
(1) Notify the provider of health care that he or she:
(I) Does not meet the requirements to continue to hold a
Gold Card Exemption; and
(II) May appeal the determination of the health carrier
in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection
8; and
(2) Unless the determination that the provider no longer
meets the requirements of subsection 2 is reversed on appeal,
revoke the Gold Card Exemption.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 6, 7 and 8 of
section 56 of this act, a health carrier shall not require a provider
of health care who holds a Gold Card Exemption to obtain prior
authorization for any goods and services to which the Gold Card
Exemption applies.
5. A health carrier shall maintain on an Internet website
maintained by the health carrier a list of all providers of health
care who hold a Gold Card Exemption. The list must include, for
each provider, the specialty of the provider and the goods and
services covered by the Gold Card Exemption.
6. A health carrier may audit providers of health care who
hold Gold Card Exemptions to determine whether those providers
of health care meet the requirements of this section and the
regulations adopted thereto. If a health carrier determines that
such a provider of health care does not meet those requirements,
the health carrier may, after notice and the opportunity for an
appeal:
(a) Suspend or revoke the Gold Card Exemption; or
(b) Impose any other penalties authorized by the regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection 8.
7. The Commissioner shall periodically:
(a) Evaluate, including, without limitation, by soliciting input
from interested persons and entities, the effectiveness of the Gold
Card Exemption Program in reducing administrative burdens and
improving the delivery of health care; and
(b) Revise the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 8
and submit such recommendations to the Legislature as are
necessary to improve the Gold Card Exemption Program based on
the evaluations conducted pursuant to paragraph (a).
-
*SB495_R1*

– 105 –
8. The Commissioner, in collaboration with the Department
of Health and Human Services, shall adopt such regulations as
are necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including,
without limitation, regulations establishing:
(a) The goods and services which are eligible for a Gold Card
Exemption;
(b) The procedure to determine the eligibility of a provider of
health care for a Gold Card Exemption;
(c) Any requirements, in addition to the requirements
prescribed in subsection 2, for a provider of health care to be
eligible to receive or continue to hold a Gold Card Exemption,
which may include, without limitation, requirements governing
the quality of care provided by the provider of health care;
(d) Procedures for appeals pursuant to subsections 3 and 6;
(e) Procedures for conducting audits pursuant to subsection 6;
and
(f) Penalties that may be imposed pursuant to subsection 6.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Network” means a defined set of providers of health care
who are under contract with a health carrier to provide health
care services pursuant to a network plan offered or issued by the
health carrier.
(b) “Network plan” means a contract or policy of health
insurance offered by a health carrier under which the financing
and delivery of medical care is provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers under contract with the health
carrier.
Sec. 108. 1. The Commissioner shall prescribe by
regulation such additional requirements for the issuance of a
certificate of authority pursuant to NRS 680A.160 to an insurer
that will provide health benefits, the issuance of a certificate of
registration pursuant to NRS 683A.08524 to an administrator that
will perform any function related to prior authorization for
medical care or the payment of claims under a policy or contract
of health insurance, the approval of an independent review
organization pursuant to NRS 683A.3715 or the registration of an
agent who performs utilization review pursuant to NRS 683A.378
to ensure that the insurer, administrator, organization or agent, as
applicable, is equipped to comply with the provisions of NRS
687B.225 and sections 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act, and, where
applicable, NRS 683A.0879, 689A.410, 689B.255, 689C.335,
695A.188, 695B.2505 or 695C.185.
2. The Commissioner, in consultation with the Board of the
Public Employees’ Benefits Program, shall adopt regulations
establishing criteria to ensure that any health carrier with which
-
*SB495_R1*

– 106 –
the Board contracts is in compliance with the requirements of
NRS 687B.225, sections 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act and, where
applicable, NRS 683A.0879, 689A.410, 689B.255, 689C.335,
695A.188, 695B.2505 or 695C.185.
3. The Commissioner shall:
(a) Perform an annual audit of each health carrier that
operates in this State to ensure compliance with the requirements
of NRS 687B.225, sections 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act, and,
where applicable, NRS 683A.0879, 689A.410, 689B.255,
689C.335, 695A.188, 695B.2505 or 695C.185;
(b) Annually publish on an Internet website maintained by the
Commissioner a report concerning compliance by health carriers
with the requirements of NRS 687B.225, sections 97 to 108,
inclusive, of this act, and, where applicable, NRS 683A.0879,
689A.410, 689B.255, 689C.335, 695A.188, 695B.2505 or
695C.185; and
(c) Accept and investigate grievances from providers of health
care concerning possible violations of NRS 687B.225, sections 97
to 108, inclusive, of this act, and, where applicable, NRS
683A.0879, 689A.410, 689B.255, 689C.335, 695A.188, 695B.2505
or 695C.185.
4. The Commissioner, in collaboration with the Department
of Health and Human Services, shall:
(a) Annually hold a public meeting to:
(1) Review the implementation of NRS 687B.225 and
sections 53 to 63, inclusive, and 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act;
and
(2) Solicit input on the implementation of NRS 687B.225
and sections 53 to 63, inclusive, and 97 to 108, inclusive, of this
act from health carriers, providers of health care, patients and
other interested persons and entities; and
(b) Based on the input provided pursuant to subparagraph (2)
of paragraph (a), adopt such regulations or submit such
recommendations to the Legislature as are necessary to improve
the process for requesting prior authorization in this State.
Sec. 109. 1. A health carrier, or any entity to which a
health carrier delegates credentialing functions, shall:
(a) Use the Provider Data Portal, or any successor system,
established by the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare, or
its successor organization, to accept submissions by providers of
health care for credentialing; and
(b) Use an entity that holds the Credentials Verification
Organization Certification issued by the National Committee for
Quality Assurance, or its successor organization, for the purpose
of verifying the credentials of providers of health care seeking to
-
*SB495_R1*

– 107 –
participate in the network of the health carrier. A health carrier or
entity to which a health carrier delegates credentialing functions
may itself perform the functions described in this paragraph if the
health carrier or entity, as applicable, holds such certification.
2. The Commissioner shall:
(a) Perform an annual audit of each health carrier that
operates in this State to ensure compliance with the requirements
of this section;
(b) Collect from health carriers and entities to which health
carriers designate credentialing functions such data as is
necessary to compile the report required by paragraph (c); and
(c) On or before February 1 of each year:
(1) Compile a report on the credentialing of providers of
health care which includes, without limitation:
(I) The average time between the submission by a
provider of health care of a request to a health carrier for
credentialing and the request being approved or denied, for each
health carrier in this State and aggregated for all health carriers
in this State; and
(II) Recommendations for improvements to the process
for credentialing providers of health care, including, without
limitation, recommendations concerning improvements to
technology or procedures to increase the efficiency of the process;
and
(2) Submit the report to the Governor and the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(I) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(II) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of
the Legislature.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Credentialing” means verifying the credentials of a
provider of health care for the purpose of determining whether the
provider of health care meets the requirements for participation in
the network of a health carrier.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 110. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
-
*SB495_R1*

– 108 –
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177, any contract [for group, blanket or
individual health] or policy of insurance [or any contract by a
nonprofit hospital, medical or dental service corporation or
organization for dental care] issued by a health carrier which
provides for payment of a certain part of medical [or dental] care
may require the insured [or member] to obtain prior authorization
for that care from the insurer . [or organization. The insurer or
organization]
2. A health carrier shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining approval of care pursuant to
this section for approval by the Commissioner; and
(b) Unless a [shorter] different time period is prescribed by a
specific statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446,
689B.0361, 689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and
695G.1703 [, respond to] and except as otherwise provided in
subsections 3 and 4, approve or deny any request for approval by
the insured [or member] pursuant to this section or provide notice of
a delay in accordance with section 102 of this act within [20] :
(1) Two business days after it receives the request [.
2.] ; or
(2) If the Prior Authorization and Referrals Operating
Rules prescribed by the Committee on Operating Rules for
Information Exchange of the Council for Affordable Quality
Healthcare, or its successor organization, would allow the health
carrier more than 2 business days to respond to the particular
request for prior authorization after receiving the request, the time
period prescribed by the Rules.
3. Notwithstanding any time period prescribed by the rules
described in subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of subsection 2, a
health carrier shall respond as required by paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 to a request for prior authorization within 7 calendar
days after receiving the request.
4. The Commissioner, in collaboration with the Department
of Health and Human Services, shall review each revision to the
Rules described in subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 to ensure their suitability for this State. If the
Commissioner determines that a revision is not suitable for this
State, the Commissioner shall hold a public hearing within 6
months after the date the Rules were revised to review his or her
determination. If the Commissioner does not revise his or her
determination, the Commissioner shall give notice within 30 days
-
*SB495_R1*

– 109 –
after the hearing that the revisions are not suitable for this State.
If the Commissioner gives such notice, a health carrier shall
respond as required by paragraph (b) of subsection 2 to any
request for prior authorization that is submitted to the health
carrier after the date on which such notice is given within 2
business days after receiving the request.
5. The procedure for prior authorization may not discriminate
among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
6. If a health carrier fails to comply with paragraph (b) of
subsection 2 or subsection 3 or 4, as applicable, with respect to a
particular request for prior authorization, the request shall be
deemed approved.
7. A health carrier shall not require prior authorization for
emergency services covered by the health carrier, including, where
applicable, transportation by ambulance to a hospital or other
medical facility.
8. As used in this section, “emergency services” means health
care services that are provided by a provider of health care to
screen and to stabilize an insured after the sudden onset of a
medical condition that manifests itself by symptoms of such
sufficient severity that a prudent person would believe that the
absence of immediate medical attention could result in:
(a) Serious jeopardy to the health of the insured;
(b) Serious jeopardy to the health of an unborn child of the
insured;
(c) Serious impairment of a bodily function of the insured; or
(d) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part of the
insured.
Sec. 111. NRS 687B.600 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.600 As used in NRS 687B.600 to 687B.850, inclusive,
and section 109 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires,
the words and terms defined in NRS 687B.602 to 687B.665,
inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 112. NRS 687B.670 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.670 If a health carrier offers or issues a network plan, the
health carrier shall, with regard to that network plan:
1. Comply with all applicable requirements set forth in NRS
687B.600 to 687B.850, inclusive [;] and section 109 of this act;
2. As applicable, ensure that each contract entered into for the
purposes of the network plan between a participating provider of
health care and the health carrier complies with the requirements set
forth in NRS 687B.600 to 687B.850, inclusive [;] , and section 109
of this act; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 110 –
3. As applicable, ensure that the network plan complies with
the requirements set forth in NRS 687B.600 to 687B.850, inclusive
[.] , and section 109 of this act.
Sec. 113. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, subsections 2, 4, 17,
18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060,
inclusive, chapter 681B of NRS, NRS 686A.010 to 686A.315,
inclusive, 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, 687B.010 to
687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070 to 687B.140, inclusive, 687B.150,
687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200 to 687B.255, inclusive, 687B.270,
687B.310 to 687B.380, inclusive, 687B.410, 687B.420, 687B.430,
687B.500 and section 109 of this act and chapters 692B, 692C,
693A and 696B of NRS, to the extent applicable and not in conflict
with the express provisions of this chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 114. NRS 695B.320 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.320 1. Nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporations are subject to the provisions of this chapter, and to the
provisions of chapters 679A and 679B of NRS, subsections 2, 4, 17,
18 and 30 of NRS 680B.010, NRS 680B.025 to 680B.060,
inclusive, chapter 681B of NRS, NRS 686A.010 to
686A.315, inclusive, 686B.010 to 686B.175, inclusive, 687B.010 to
687B.040, inclusive, 687B.070 to 687B.140, inclusive, 687B.150,
687B.160, 687B.180, 687B.200 to 687B.255, inclusive, and
sections 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act, 687B.270, 687B.310 to
687B.380, inclusive, 687B.410, 687B.420, 687B.430, 687B.500 and
section 109 of this act and chapters 692B, 692C, 693A and 696B of
NRS, to the extent applicable and not in conflict with the express
provisions of this chapter.
2. For the purposes of this section and the provisions set forth
in subsection 1, a nonprofit hospital and medical or dental service
corporation is included in the meaning of the term “insurer.”
Sec. 115. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 116. NRS 695K.220 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695K.220 1. The Director, in consultation with the
Commissioner and the Executive Director of the Exchange, shall
use a statewide competitive bidding process, including, without
limitation, a request for proposals, to solicit and enter into contracts
-
*SB495_R1*

– 111 –
with health carriers or other qualified persons or entities to
administer the Public Option. If a statewide Medicaid managed care
program is established pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 422.273, the
competitive bidding process must coincide with the statewide
procurement process for that Medicaid managed care program.
2. Each health carrier that provides health care services through
managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for
Medicaid or the Children’s Health Insurance Program shall, as a
condition of continued participation in any Medicaid managed care
program established in this State, submit a good faith proposal in
response to a request for proposals issued pursuant to subsection 1.
3. Each proposal submitted pursuant to subsection 2 must
demonstrate that the applicant is able to meet the requirements of
NRS 695K.200 [.] and meets the criteria prescribed by the
regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 2 of section 108 of this
act.
4. When selecting a health carrier or other qualified person or
entity to administer the Public Option, the Director shall prioritize
applicants whose proposals:
(a) Demonstrate alignment of networks of providers between the
Public Option and Medicaid managed care, where applicable;
(b) Provide for the inclusion of critical access hospitals, rural
health clinics, certified community behavioral health clinics and
federally-qualified health centers in the networks of providers for
the Public Option and Medicaid managed care, where applicable;
(c) Include proposals for strengthening the workforce in this
State and particularly in rural areas of this State for providers of
primary care, mental health care and treatment for substance use
disorders;
(d) Use payment models for providers included in the networks
of providers for the Public Option that increase value for persons
enrolled in the Public Option and the State; and
(e) Include proposals to contract with providers of health care in
a manner that decreases disparities among different populations in
this State with regard to access to health care and health outcomes
and supports culturally competent care.
5. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections 1 to 4,
inclusive, the Director may directly administer the Public Option if
necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.
6. Any health carrier or other person or entity with which the
Director contracts to administer the Public Option pursuant to this
section or the Director, if the Director directly administers the
Public Option pursuant to subsection 5, shall take any measures
necessary to make the Public Option available as described in
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 695K.200 and, if required by
-
*SB495_R1*

– 112 –
the Director, paragraph (b) of that subsection. Such measures
include, without limitation:
(a) Filing rates and supporting information with the
Commissioner of Insurance as required by NRS 686B.010 to
686B.1799, inclusive; and
(b) Obtaining certification as a qualified health plan pursuant to
42 U.S.C. § 18031.
7. The Director shall deposit into the Trust Fund any money
received from:
(a) A health carrier or other person or entity with which the
Director contracts to administer the Public Option pursuant to
subsection 1 which relates to duties performed under the contract; or
(b) If the Director directly administers the Public Option
pursuant to subsection 5, any money received from any person or
entity in the course of administering the Public Option.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Critical access hospital” means a hospital which has been
certified as a critical access hospital by the Secretary of Health and
Human Services pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1395i-4(e).
(b) “Health carrier” means an entity subject to the insurance
laws and regulations of this State, or subject to the jurisdiction of the
Commissioner, that contracts or offers to contract to provide,
deliver, arrange for, pay for or reimburse any of the costs of health
care services, including, without limitation, a sickness and accident
health insurance company, a health maintenance organization, a
nonprofit hospital and health service corporation or any other entity
providing a plan of health insurance, health benefits or health care
services.
Sec. 116.3. NRS 719.200 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
719.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
provisions of this chapter apply to electronic records and electronic
signatures relating to a transaction.
2. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to a transaction
to the extent it is governed by:
(a) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law, a law
governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils or
testamentary trusts;
(b) The Uniform Commercial Code other than NRS 104.1306,
104.2101 to 104.2725, inclusive, and 104A.2101 to 104A.2532,
inclusive; or
(c) The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
3. The provisions of this chapter apply to an electronic record
or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of
-
*SB495_R1*

– 113 –
this chapter under subsection 2 to the extent it is governed by a law
other than those specified in subsection 2.
4. A transaction subject to the provisions of this chapter is also
subject to other applicable substantive law.
Sec. 116.7. NRS 720.140 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
720.140 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the provisions of this chapter apply to any transaction for which a
digital signature is used to sign an electronic record. The provisions
of this chapter do not apply to a digital signature that is used to sign
an electronic health record in accordance with NRS 439.581 to
439.597, inclusive, and section 1 of this act and the regulations
adopted pursuant thereto.
2. As used in this section, “electronic record” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 719.090.
Sec. 117. Section 50 of this act is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 50. 1. The Department or any entity to which the
Department delegates credentialing functions for Medicaid or
the Children’s Health Insurance Program shall:
(a) Use the Provider Data Portal, or any successor system,
established by the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare,
or its successor organization, to accept submissions by
providers of health care for credentialing; and
(b) Use an entity that holds the Credentials Verification
Organization Certification issued by the National Committee
for Quality Assurance, or its successor organization, for the
purpose of verifying the credentials of providers of health
care seeking to participate in Medicaid or the Children’s
Health Insurance Program.
2. The Department shall ensure that, for at least 95
percent of the complete requests for credentialing submitted
by providers of health care to the Department or an entity to
which the Department delegates credentialing functions, the
Department or entity processes the request not later than 60
days after the Department or entity, as applicable, receives
all information necessary to complete the request.
3. For the purposes of subsection 2, a request for
credentialing shall be deemed to be complete if:
(a) The provider of health care who submitted the
request has completed all fields prescribed by the Council
for Affordable Quality Healthcare, or its successor
organization;
(b) The provider of health care receives electronic notice
that the credentialing application is complete; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 114 –
(c) The completed request is made available through the
Portal or successor system described in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 to the Department or the entity to which the
Department delegates credentialing functions.
4. An entity to which the Department delegates
credentialing functions shall immediately notify the
Department of:
(a) Any delay in credentialing that exceeds the time
period specified in subsection 2;
(b) Steps taken to ensure that the request that is subject
to the delay is processed as quickly as possible; and
(c) An anticipated timeline to complete the processing of
the request.
5. On or before February 1 of each year, the Department
shall:
(a) Compile a report on the credentialing of providers of
health care which includes, without limitation:
(1) The average time between the submission of a
request by a provider of health care for credentialing for
Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance Program
during the immediately preceding year and the request being
approved or denied; and
(2) The rates at which requests for credentialing are
processed within the time period specified in subsection 2,
for Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance
Program; and
[(2)] (3) Recommendations for improvements to the
process for credentialing providers of health care for
Medicaid and the Children’s Health Insurance Program,
including, without limitation, recommendations concerning
improvements to technology or procedures to increase the
efficiency of the process; and
(b) Submit the report to the Governor and the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(2) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of
the Legislature.
[3.] 6. As used in this section:
(a) “Credentialing” means verifying the credentials of a
provider of health care for the purpose of determining
whether the provider of health care meets the requirements
for participation in Medicaid or the Children’s Health
Insurance Program as a provider of services.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 115 –
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 118. Section 109 of this act is hereby amended to read as
follows:
Sec. 109. 1. A health carrier, or any entity to which a
health carrier delegates credentialing functions, shall:
(a) Use the Provider Data Portal, or any successor system,
established by the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare,
or its successor organization, to accept submissions by
providers of health care for credentialing; and
(b) Use an entity that holds the Credentials Verification
Organization Certification issued by the National Committee
for Quality Assurance, or its successor organization, for the
purpose of verifying the credentials of providers of health
care seeking to participate in the network of the health carrier.
A health carrier or entity to which a health carrier delegates
credentialing functions may itself perform the functions
described in this paragraph if the health carrier or entity, as
applicable, holds such certification.
2. A health carrier shall:
(a) Ensure that, for at least 95 percent of the complete
requests for credentialing submitted by providers of health
care to the health carrier or an entity to which the health
carrier delegates credentialing functions, the health carrier
or entity processes the request not later than 60 days after
the health carrier or entity, as applicable, receives all
information necessary to complete the request; and
(b) Immediately notify the Commissioner of:
(1) Any delay in credentialing that exceeds the time
period specified in paragraph (a);
(2) Steps taken to ensure that the request that is
subject to the delay is processed as quickly as possible; and
(3) An anticipated timeline to complete the
processing of the request.
3. For the purposes of subsection 2, a request for
credentialing shall be deemed to be complete if:
(a) The provider of health care who submitted the
request has completed all fields prescribed by the Council
for Affordable Quality Healthcare, or its successor
organization;
(b) The provider of health care receives electronic notice
that the credentialing application is complete; and
(c) The completed request is made available through the
Portal or successor system described in paragraph (a) of
-
*SB495_R1*

– 116 –
subsection 1 to the health carrier or the entity to which the
health carrier delegates credentialing functions.
4. An entity to which a health carrier delegates
credentialing functions shall immediately notify the health
carrier of any delay in credentialing that exceeds the time
period specified in paragraph (a) of subsection 2. Such
notice must include the information listed in paragraph (b)
of subsection 2.
5. The Commissioner shall:
(a) Perform an annual audit of each health carrier that
operates in this State to ensure compliance with the
requirements of this section;
(b) Collect from health carriers and entities to which
health carriers designate credentialing functions such data as
is necessary to compile the report required by paragraph (b);
and
(c) On or before February 1 of each year:
(1) Compile a report on the credentialing of providers
of health care which includes, without limitation:
(I) The average time between the submission by a
provider of health care of a request to a health carrier for
credentialing and the request being approved or denied, for
each health carrier in this State and aggregated for all health
carriers in this State; [and]
(II) The rates at which requests for credentialing
are processed within the time period specified in paragraph
(a) of subsection 2, for each health carrier in this State and
aggregated for all health carriers in this State; and
(III) Recommendations for improvements to the
process for credentialing providers of health care, including,
without limitation, recommendations concerning
improvements to technology or procedures to increase the
efficiency of the process; and
(2) Submit the report to the Governor and the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(I) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Health and Human Services; and
(II) In odd-numbered years, the next regular
session of the Legislature.
[3.] 6. As used in this section:
(a) “Credentialing” means verifying the credentials of a
provider of health care for the purpose of determining
whether the provider of health care meets the requirements
for participation in the network of a health carrier.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 117 –
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 119. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 119.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Division of Health Care Financing and Policy
of the Department of Health and Human Services the sum of
$291,296 to carry out the provisions of sections 51.3, 51.5 and 51.8
of this act.
2. Expenditure of $1,149,153 not appropriated from the State
General Fund or the State Highway Fund is hereby authorized
during Fiscal Year 2026-2027 by the Division of Health Care
Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and Human
Services for the same purpose as set forth in subsection 1.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 120. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Patient Protection Commission created by NRS
439.908 the sum of $200,000 to conduct the study required by
section 121 of this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 120.3. 1. An independent center for emergency medical
care that was licensed on the date on which this act was enacted is
exempt from the requirements of subsection 3 of NRS 449.1818, as
amended by section 26.5 of this act.
2. As used in this section, “independent center for emergency
medical care” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.013, as that
section existed on January 1, 2025.
-
*SB495_R1*

– 118 –
Sec. 120.6. 1. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of
section 22.5 of this act, an independent center for emergency
medical care that is owned or operated by, or otherwise part of, a
hospital may continue to operate without obtaining a license
separate from the license of the hospital pursuant to NRS 449.080
until July 1, 2026.
2. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of section 24.8
of this act, the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services shall issue a license to
operate an independent center for emergency medical care that was
operating on the date on which this act was enacted and is located
within 5 miles of another independent center for emergency medical
care or a hospital with an emergency department if the independent
center for emergency medical care otherwise qualifies for licensure
pursuant to NRS 449.080.
3. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of section 24.8
of this act, the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services shall issue a license to
operate an independent center for emergency medical care that is
located within 5 miles of another independent center for emergency
medical care or a hospital with an emergency department and that
otherwise qualifies for licensure pursuant to NRS 449.080 at the
time of the application for licensure if, on or before January 1, 2025,
the owner or operator of the independent center for emergency
medical care had:
(a) Acquired the land upon which the independent center for
emergency medical care is to be constructed;
(b) Obtained or was in the process of obtaining all necessary
permits, licenses or other required approvals necessary for the
construction of the independent center for emergency medical care;
and
(c) Commenced the process of obtaining approval from the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant
to NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102, if applicable.
4. As used in this section, “independent center for emergency
medical care” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.013, as
amended by section 22.5 of this act.
Sec. 121. 1. During the 2025-2026 interim, the Patient
Protection Commission shall study the adequacy of the academic
medical centers in this State. The study must include, without
limitation:
(a) An assessment of the current and projected health care
workforce in this State;
-
*SB495_R1*

– 119 –
(b) An evaluation of potential locations for the development or
enhancement of academic medical centers in this State, which must
consider, without limitation:
(1) Equity among the geographic areas of this State; and
(2) The needs of the population in the diverse geographic
areas of this State for the services of an academic medical center;
(c) An analysis of models for sustainable funding of academic
medical centers that utilize money from the State and Federal
Governments and private persons and entities;
(d) Recommendations for integrating existing public and private
medical institutions into a cohesive statewide academic medical
system;
(e) Identification of strategies to expand programs for residency
training and postdoctoral fellowships for physicians with a focus on
specialties for which a high need exists and on underserved
geographic areas of this State;
(f) Exploration of opportunities for partnerships between the
public and private sector to support the operations of academic
medical centers and economic development relating to health care;
and
(g) An evaluation of the ability of various models of governance
for academic medical centers to ensure accountability, facilitate the
input of interested persons and entities and align the activities of the
academic medical center with the long-term goals of the State
Government relating to health care.
2. In conducting the study described in subsection 1, the
Patient Protection Commission shall consult with:
(a) Experts in health care, academic institutions and economics;
and
(b) Representatives of various communities in this State.
3. On or before November 6, 2026, the Patient Protection
Commission shall:
(a) Compile a comprehensive report of the findings and
recommendations resulting from the study conducted pursuant to
subsection 1; and
(b) Submit the report to:
(1) The Governor; and
(2) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the next regular session of the Legislature.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Academic medical center” means a medical school and its
affiliated teaching hospitals and clinics that:
(1) Operate a program for residency training and
postdoctoral fellowships for physicians, and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 120 –
(2) Conduct research that is overseen by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services and involves human
subjects.
(b) “Patient Protection Commission” means the Patient
Protection Commission created by NRS 439.908.
Sec. 121.5. If Senate Bill No. 494 of this session is enacted
and creates the Nevada Health Authority, the Office of Mental
Health created by section 67 of this act is transferred from the
Department of Health and Human Services to the Nevada Health
Authority.
Sec. 122. 1. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
apply to a request for prior authorization submitted:
(a) Under a contract or policy of health insurance issued before
January 1, 2028, but apply to any request for prior authorization
submitted under any renewal of such a contract or policy.
(b) To the Department of Health and Human Services before
January 1, 2028, for medical or dental care provided to a recipient of
Medicaid.
2. A health carrier must, in order to continue requiring prior
authorization in contracts or policies of health insurance issued or
renewed after January 1, 2028:
(a) Develop a procedure for obtaining prior authorization that
complies with NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 110 of this
act, and sections 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Obtain the approval of the Commissioner of Insurance
pursuant to NRS 687B.225, as amended by section 110 of this act,
and sections 97 to 108, inclusive, of this act for the procedure
developed pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. As used in this section, “health carrier” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 98 of this act.
Sec. 122.5. The Department of Health and Human Services:
1. Is not required to implement the provisions of subsections 9,
10 and 11 of section 56 of this act until January 1, 2029; and
2. May, between January 1, 2028, and January 1, 2029, collect
such data from providers of services under Medicaid as may be
necessary to prepare to implement those provisions.
Sec. 123. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer, agency or other entity whose name has been changed or
whose responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the
provisions of this act to another officer, agency or other entity
remain in force until amended by the officer, agency or other entity
to which the responsibility for the adoption of the regulations has
been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
-
*SB495_R1*

– 121 –
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 124. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 125. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 126. NRS 450B.215 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 127. 1. This section and sections 1 to 3.3, inclusive, 4,
4.5, 5, 6, 8, 14 to 18, inclusive, 32.5, 43, 45.5, 67.9, 70, 71, 72.3,
72.5, 116.3, 116.7 and 123 to 126, inclusive, of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 5.5, 7, 33 to 40, inclusive, 42, 66.3 to 67.8,
inclusive, 119, 120, 121 and 121.5 of this act become effective on
July 1, 2025.
3. Sections 3.6, 8.5 to 13.5, inclusive, 19, 20, 22.5 to 32,
inclusive, 41, 41.5, 42.5, 46, 48 to 51.3, inclusive, 68, 72.8, 73, 74,
76 to 84, inclusive, 86 to 90, inclusive, 95.5, 109, 111, 112, 113,
120.3 and 120.6 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
4. Sections 75 and 85 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
5. Section 119.5 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
6. Sections 51.5 and 51.8 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
-
*SB495_R1*

– 122 –
(b) On October 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
7. Sections 21, 117 and 118 of this act become effective on
January 1, 2027.
8. Sections 22, 44, 45, 47, 52 to 66, inclusive, 69, 72, 91 to 95,
inclusive, and 96 to 108, inclusive, 110, 114, 115, 116, 122 and
122.5 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2028, for all other purposes.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
450B.215 Administrative sanctions for failure to comply
with requirements concerning electronic health information.
1. If the health authority receives notification from the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to NRS
439.5895 that the holder of a permit to operate an ambulance, air
ambulance or vehicle of a fire-fighting agency is not in compliance
with the requirements of subsection 4 of NRS 439.589, the health
authority may, after notice and the opportunity for a hearing in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter, require corrective
action or impose an administrative penalty in an amount established
by regulation of the board.
2. The health authority shall not suspend or revoke a permit for
failure to comply with the requirements of subsection 4 of
NRS 439.589.
H
-
*SB495_R1*